
All the blood in my body rushed between my legs—almost as if every
molecule needed a cleansing—searching for relief from the hot, cold,
tempting, vile way he’d touched me.
He looked so elegant in his dark grey suit, so refined with the glint of
diamond on his lapel. Why did someone so horrid look so beautiful? It
wasn’t fair. Nature’s cruel irony. In jungles, birds died from being attracted
to the gleam of cavernous flowers. In rainforests, snakes and omnivores
succumbed to toxin-riddled-jewelled frogs.
Beauty was the ultimate arsenal. Beauty was meant to deceive. It was
meant to trick and beguile so their prey never saw death coming.
It worked.
And to a woman who made her life creating beauty for others and never
being granted the ease of naturally acquiring it, Jethro was a double threat,
both to my ego and lifespan.
Turning back to offer me his palm, Jethro waited for me to accept his
token of help.
I ignored him.
I wasn’t naturally a defiant person, but there was something about him
that made me become a brat. Pushing off the seat, I propelled myself
awkwardly and stiffly to the open door. The moment I was in grabbing
distance, Jethro snatched my wrist and jerked me from the vehicle.
Of course, standing for me was already a careful affair, mixed with an
unknown substance that’d hijacked my motor controls, I didn’t land on my
feet.
With a cry, I tripped out of the SUV, sprawling face first on the gravel
below. The car suddenly cranked into gear and drove off. Leaving me alone
and bruised before a manor worth millions.
“What on earth?” The gruff exclamation came from above—different
from Jethro’s deep timbre, but powerful and full of supple authority.
“Goddammit, this is getting ridiculous,” Jethro muttered. “Are you
going to be like this all the time?”
His strong hands lassoed around my waist, yanking me to my feet. The
moment I was vertical I blinked, trying my hardest to find an anchor and
remain standing. The world steadied and I shook Jethro’s lingering hold off
my hipbone. “Yes, I’m ridiculous. Yes, I’ve suffered all my life. Yes, I know
it’s a huge inconvenience for someone who wants to kill me that I’m
already a little bit damaged, but did you stop to think—just once—that the
reason I’m struggling more than normal is because of the stress you’re
loading my system with?
“Have you never dealt with an upset stomach or a tension headache?”
Waving my hand in his face, I snapped, “It’s the same thing. My body
doesn’t handle upsetting circumstances well. Get over it or let me the hell
go!”
It felt wonderful to let go of the anger bubbling inside. It purged me a
little, giving me room to breathe.
Jethro remained steadfast, his eyes wide, mouth thin and unamused.
“Well, she has fight. All the fun ones did.”
The man who’d spoken stood on the second-to-last step of a humongous
portico. The house loomed overhead, blotting out the moon and stars as if it
were a living entity. Burnished copper gilded the many roofs and turrets,
criss-crossing flowerbeds lived beneath soaring lead-light windows, and
lattice planted grass grew on the side of the turrets. It wasn’t just a building
—it was alive. Maintained, proud, a piece of impressive architecture that
had weathered centuries, but been so well cared for.
I craned my neck left and right. The building continued on and on, at
least ten stories high, with intricate alcoves, sweeping doorways, and a
hawk embellishing every keystone.
It’s a work of art. I was a creator. My passion didn’t just lie in textiles,
but in everything where a level of skill blared from every inch.
And Hawksridge Hall was majestic.
I wanted to hate it. I despised the family who owned it. But I’d always
been a lover of history. I’d always pictured myself as a lady of a manor,
with horses and gardens and refined dinner parties. I loved exploring stately
homes, not for the furniture or statues, but for the drapery, hand-stitched
wallpaper, and massive hanging tapestries.
Jethro took a step toward the older gentleman. “You said it would be
easy. I can assure you, it wasn’t.” Throwing a cold look over his shoulder,
Jethro motioned me forward. “Come here and pay your respects.”
I didn’t move.
The older man chuckled. He wore all black, and just like the man who
brought my belongings in the parking garage in Milan, he wore a black
leather jacket with a silhouette of a diamond on the pocket.
His hair was fully white, yet his face wasn’t too weathered. He had a
goatee, which was more dirty grey than snow, and eyes were as light and
unnerving as Jethro’s.
Instantly my back stiffened; my heart bucked in refusal. This man didn’t
deserve respect. I wanted nothing to do with him.
Just as I knew the younger man in the car was Jethro’s brother, I knew
without a doubt this was his father. This man was responsible for upholding
the evil pastime of torturing innocence for something that should stay in the
past. He was ultimately responsible for my demise.
Jethro stalked back, stole my arm, and marched me forward. Under his
breath, he said, “Don’t annoy me. I’m warning you.”
Jerking me to a halt in front of his father, he spoke louder. “Ms. Weaver,
let me introduce you to Bryan Hawk. Head of our family, President to his
fellow riders, and current man in a long line of succession to wear the
family name.”
He glared at me, making sure I listened. “He’s also known as Cut
amongst his brotherhood. But to you, he will always be addressed as Mr.
Hawk.”
Mr. Hawk grinned, holding out his hand. “Welcome to my humble
abode.”
I shied away, not wanting to touch him, be close to him, or even have to
tolerate talking to him.
Jethro growled under his breath, grabbing my elbow and holding me
firm. “You’re one infraction away from sleeping with the hounds, Ms.
Weaver. Try me. Disobey once more.”
His father laughed. “Ah, I remember those days. The fun, the
discipline.” Climbing down the final step, he closed the space between us.
His aftershave reeked of sadism and old money—if that had a smell. A
horrid mix of spice and musk that gave me an instant headache, whilst his
eyes stole everything about me from my reflection to my dismal future.
He cupped my cheek.
I flinched, expecting the brutality and roughness I’d come to expect
from a Hawk, but he ran his thumb gently over my cheekbone. “Hello, Nila.
It’s a pleasure to once again entertain a Weaver in our modest home.”
Hearing my name repulsed me. Jethro hadn’t used it yet—sticking to the
impersonal address of my last-name. I hated that Mr. Hawk thought he had
the authority to speak it.
Wanting to spit in his face, I focused on the house behind him—
swallowing the urge. My gaze soared to the stained glass windows, the
imposing spires, and impressive stonework. There was nothing modest
about this dwelling, and he knew it.
I kept my lips clamped. I had a whole novel of horrible things I wanted
to say, but Jethro’s seething bulk beside me kept my tongue in check.
Jethro let me go, pushing me into his father. “She’s been nothing but
trouble. I can’t deny I’m looking forward to tomorrow.”
My heart leapt into my throat at the dark promise in his voice. What’s
going to happen tomorrow?
Mr. Hawk dropped his palm from my cheek, wrapping his arm around
my waist. With his free hand, he brushed wayward strands from my eye.
“You look just like your mother. It’s a pity I’m not the one extracting in this
particular instance, but rest assured, I will enjoy you once or twice.”
My stomach latched onto my heart, making me sick. Don’t ask. The
question blared in my head. What did you do to my mother?
I’d been so young and full of righteous anger at her leaving my father. I
thought she was the villain—the heartbreaker.
But she was the one who paid an unpayable price. And never returned.
Mr. Hawk’s eyes glinted. “I see Jethro hasn’t told you anything yet.”
Trailing his hand from my hair to my lips, he stroked me gently. “That’s
going to be a fun conversation, but for now I’ll let you in on a little family
secret.” Crushing me against him, he whispered, “I’m the one who stole her.
I’m the one who took debt after debt from her unwilling skin. And do you
know what she begged for in her final minutes of life?”
My head swam. My world roared. Life as I knew it ended.
I hated him.
I loathed him.
I’ll kill you.
I’d never felt such heat, such insanely burning desire to cause harm. My
teeth ached from clenching; my nails drew blood from my palms.
“She begged for your life. To end it with her and to let you live in
peace.” His hand left my waist, grabbing my arse with a vicious grip.
“Know what I told her?” His breath smelled of liquor and cigars, making
me swallow his words. “I told her you were born a Weaver, you’ll die a
Weaver. And that’s the simplistic way of our world.”
Shoving me away, I ping-ponged from father to son, coming to an
abrupt halt in Jethro’s arms. The relief at being away from the man who’d
murdered my mother made my limbs weak and jittery, but I couldn’t stop
the hatred from gnawing a gaping hole in my soul. I needed it out. I needed
it spoken so he would know the debt might not have ended with my mother
but it would end with me.
It will.
“I pity you. I knew nothing about you, your sons, your warped
perception of life until tonight. I may not know why you’re doing this but I
do know one thing. I know that it’s the last time you’ll ever do it.”
“Quiet!” Jethro shook me. But I wasn’t scared of him. I wasn’t scared of
any of them anymore. They were bullies. Sadistic bastards who’d met their
match.
Struggling in his arms, I freed my hand, pointing a livid finger at Mr.
Hawk. I lost my rage, tilting head first into lunacy. My temper gave me
power over everything. My cursed balance. My sheltered beginnings. In
that one moment of brazenness, I found a nucleus of strength I didn’t know
I had.
My voice pitched as I yelled, “I’ll kill you! I’ll watch you die just like
you watched my mother—I’ll kill you! You don’t deserve to live. I’ll kill
you and—” I launched myself at him, only to stumble and go slamming
back against a powerful form.
Jethro grabbed my shaking arm, pinning it to my side. His strong hold
crashed me against his body, moulding my wiggling behind against his rigid
front.
His body was hard and firm—exactly like the stone I thought he was.
The bulge in his trousers pressed against my lower spine.
“You’ve pushed me too far. You just had to fucking push. No one
threatens my family, least of all a girl who can barely stand without support.
And a Weaver.” He spat on my feet. “Fucking filth.”
“Remove her from my sight.” Mr. Hawk sniffed. “Teach her her place,
Jethro. I won’t put up with such stupid behaviour.” His eyes landed on me.
“As for you. I’d hoped you’d show more promise. Think what you want of
us, Ms. Weaver, but this isn’t a simple matter that will end quickly. You’re
ours for however long we wish to keep you and you’ll learn proper manners
if we have to beat it into you.”
Nodding at Jethro, he climbed the steps to the two-story-sized front
door and disappeared.
The moment he vanished, my spine rolled and I wanted nothing more
than to fall to my knees and cry.
What was I thinking?
My rage and hatred snuffed out like a candle in a storm. I’d never been
so out of control. My emotions had held me hostage and I’d snapped—for
the first time since my mother left—I’d succumbed to the intense freedom
of bitterness.
Jethro dragged me backward, his dress shoes crunching against gravel.
He didn’t wait for me to back-peddle, just clutched me hard, dragging me
like a corpse. “You’ve surprised me twice tonight, and I haven’t liked either
of them. You’ve pissed me off. So much so that—”
Slamming to a halt, he shoved my shoulder blades. “Get on your
knees.”
I wheeled forward, crashing from standing to landing on all fours.
No!
I winced as the driveway bit into my palms; my knees throbbed as sharp
pebbles cut into my skin. I looked up, my face swollen and achy from
unpermitted tears welling as deep as a bottomless lake.
This was the truth. This humiliation and admittance of power, not the
farce he’d painted. 
Jethro towered above, his legs planted wide, face etched in livid anger.
“I’m a firm advocator of rewarding good behaviour but after tonight you’ve
proven there is nothing to reward. You’re wild, unwilling, and a spoiled brat
who will learn her place.”
Leaning down, he grabbed my long hair, jerking it hard. “Did you
honestly think, after an outburst like that, that you’d deserve the comfort of
a bed? Why do it, Ms. Weaver, when you knew what was on the line?”
I couldn’t speak. My throat was pulled back, the pressure stopping all
sounds and swallows.
“I have a good mind to fuck you right here. To smash whatever sense of
entitlement or hope you’re holding onto.” He shook me.
My eyes watered at the pain.
“You’re not hearing me. This is your life now. I am your only friend.
Stop. Pissing. Me. Off.”
You’re not my friend. I have one, and his name isn’t Jethro.
Kite.
I didn’t think I’d want to message him so soon, but I needed someone
from the outside world. I needed reminding that the universe hadn’t entered
an alternate dimension and there was still hope.
When I remained silent, Jethro snarled, “You’re sleeping with the dogs.
They have better obedience than you, perhaps you can learn from them on
what we expect.”
I sniffed, fighting so hard against tears.
I didn’t even care that I wouldn’t sleep in a bed. I was past worrying
about sanitary conditions or nutritious food. All I wanted was freedom.
“Move,” Jethro breathed, his beloved silence smoothing his outburst
from before. “Don’t make me show you how a good dog moves.”
He wants you to crawl.
It had begun.
This was the beginning. And I’d brought it upon myself.
He wants to destroy you.
Using my hair as the leash, Jethro paced beside me as I went from
stationary to crawling. I crawled like an animal. I crawled like a pet. I
crawled through manicured gardens, past ponds, and statues, all the way
from manor to kennel.
Jethro.
I STRETCHED, LOOKING up at my ceiling. The plasterwork around the
huge chandelier never failed to let me know who I was.
A Hawk.
The intricate rosettes and architraving was a testament to my namesake.
Birds of prey swooped, hunted, and devoured small animals from above.
My hard cock lay heavily against my stomach. My hands clenched
beneath my head. I was so fucking close to breaking the rules and taking
Nila last night. She’d pushed me too far. I’d wanted to see how smart her
mouth could be with my dick jammed down her throat.
I should’ve taken her.
Removing my hand from beneath my pillow, I grasped my morning
wood and stroked. My eyes snapped closed as I imagined a different
outcome to last night.
Nila’s pink plump lips opening. Me sliding inside her mouth. My balls
tightening as her timid tongue welcomed my cock. She’d lick me just like
she’d done my thumb. Eager, inexperienced—a novice with so much to
give.
I’d rock forward, holding her head, giving her no choice but to take
more of my length.
I’d thrust harder, driving her from accepting to choking.
Fuck.
My hand worked tight and fast. The large bed creaked as I arched my
back, giving into the fantasy of blowing down Nila Weaver’s throat.
Fuck, yes. Take it. Yes.
My quads tightened, and I groaned as the first spasm of release shot
from my balls, creating a sticky mess on my stomach.
Fantasy Nila kept sucking me, drawing another wave of pleasure. I liked
her a lot more with my cock in her mouth. She was silent. Incapacitated.
I shivered as the last spurt of my orgasm joined the mess. I opened my
eyes.
“Goddammit.” I hadn’t meant to do that. Fuck it. It was a long night. I
deserved a little...unwinding.
It’s going to be an even longer day.
I might’ve blown my load with an imaginary vision of Nila on her
knees, but it would soon become real. Today, Nila would be initiated. She’d
be welcomed. And not just by me.
Swinging my legs out of bed, I prowled across the thick red carpet
toward my private bathroom.
I smiled, perversely happy with the day’s upcoming activities. The next
few weeks weren’t about debt repaying or vengeance, they were about
hospitality and welcoming a new Weaver into the Hawk household. She had
much to learn, her place to recognise, and all thoughts of who she was torn
from her soul and burned.
I’d use her. My father would use her. My two younger brothers would
use her. If I let myself, I would feel sorry for her.
But that permission had long since been beaten out of me.
After spending some time alone with her, I knew the handful she was.
Despite her disobedience, I rather liked her fire. Pity that fire would snuff
out almost instantly.
I paused, searching inside to see how strong my barricades were. To see
if I had enough ice inside to do everything expected of me. She was pretty, I
had to admit. She had a certain intrigue. But she was just a woman.
A woman who confuses you.
Scowling, I shoved the thought away. She confused me which wasn’t a
good thing. It was almost as bad as surprising me.
One moment she seemed so sure and strong. The next she was brittle
and breakable. And her bloody vertigo was getting on my goddamn nerves.
No. I was more than happy to let my fellow brothers share the work in
ruining her. It would be over faster, and I could go back to my life before I
knew of the stupid scroll stained with the blood of the first Weaver debts.
The sun spilled like a golden carpet, leading the way from bed to
shower. My room was vacant of personal touches but reeked in history of
past owners. Rococo style dressers, Victorian designed chairs. The
wallpaper was embossed maroon leather with gold accents.
The entire space was brooding and temperamental. I would’ve preferred
clean lines. White—which was the silence of the colour palette—with stone
furniture and metal chairs. I liked to be surrounded by an unfeeling
atmosphere but I’d never be permitted to change this area.
It was sacred.
All because it’d been the bedroom of all Hawk men who’d inherited a
Weaver woman. Their last breath was taken in this mansion. It held the
ghosts of Nila’s ancestors and would one day absorb hers, too.
The birthday present of new spurs and a heinously wicked whip glinted
on the eighteenth century sideboard. At the time, I’d thought it was a piss
poor present for turning twenty-nine, but the best present was due next year.
The true inheritance I’d been waiting for. One much better than a woman or
her tears. When I turned thirty, I would own it all.
Everything. All mine.
The fantastic ruling of Primogeniture meant as firstborn son, I inherited
the lot. My brothers wouldn’t get penny. My sister not a single diamond.
They would survive by my charity. Just like my father.
The brotherhood. The mines. The yachts. The cars. Hawksridge. And
every property overseas.
Mine.
Bryan Hawk, Cut to those in the Black Diamond brotherhood, would be
second to me. The way of our ancestors ensured young authority remained
in control of an estate that’d spilled enough blood to fill a moat around our
gates.
My father would retire, and I would be king.
I’d upgrade from living in the bachelor wing with its pool room, theatre,
office, weaponry, solarium, six bedrooms, and six bathrooms to having the
pick of a fifty room, two ballroom, and a dungeon-equipped house to play
in.
And by play, I meant rule.
Collecting new clothing from my walk-in wardrobe, I glimpsed myself
in the mirror. My lips curled in disgust at the sticky mess on my stomach. I
had a good mind to get Nila and make her lick me clean.
That was her fault.
My mind drifted back to her—against my will. She’d not only taken up
valuable space in my head, but my day’s structure as well. There would be
no hunting today or inspecting the latest diamond shipment.
There’d be no business or travel.
All my energy and focus belonged to the woman who was a waste of
my time.
Another daydream of forcing her to her knees stopped me on the
outskirts of the bathroom. Would she cry or scream as I fucked her from
behind? Perhaps she’d surprise me again and moan in ecstasy. I planned on
taking her that way—the animalistic way. After all, she did spend the night
with the dogs. It would only be fitting.
Dumping my clothes on the vanity, I strode into the four-headed quartz
shower. I had no need to strip. I slept naked.
Always did.
It was part of the rules.
Living at Hawksridge, the grandest and most exclusive motorcycle club
compound in all of England, came with strict unbreakable rules. Our
brotherhood was different. We were smart, cunning, focused.
Any man found sleeping with clothes on was in for a night of pain. We
might have left the dark ages behind but my family upheld strictness.
We made our fortune in the most transferable precious item there was.
And we’d learned a lot from past mistakes on how to treat those who tried
to steal them.
No clothes at night and random cavity searches by day.
All to protect our legacy. The way we made our money. The way we
rose from penniless thieves at the beck and call of the Weavers to gathering
a wealth that morphed to obscene a few centuries ago.
Stepping into the shower, I turned on the hot spray. Smiling at the
mirrored wall, I cupped my cock, washing the residue of my indiscretion.
The next time I come, I’ll be inside the woman I inherited.
With my cock in my hand, I nodded at my reflection.
I’m a Hawk but blood doesn’t flow in my veins. I’m born of a substance
unbeatable by any other—diamonds.
I’m a smuggler.
I’m a dealer.
And I’m about to become...a killer.
Nila.
NEEDLE&THREAD: I’m warm and in bed. Surprisingly I slept better than
I thought I would. Did you have a good night? Did you lie in your bed and
picture me pleasuring you? What did I do to you? Tell me, Kite. I want you
to transport me from reality and give me a fantasy stronger than my present
humdrum life.
Kite : Forward this morning, aren’t we? You’re that desperate to talk
about my cock? Not that I’d ever say no—but I’m rather impressed. Tell me
more...beg.
Needle&Thread: Beg? How does one beg for something they need
rather than want? Would you prefer me on my knees? Or perhaps on my
back ready for whatever you wanted to give me?
Kite : Fuck. What’s got into you? Beg. Imagine I’m standing over
you with my hard cock in my hand. I’m throttling it—my fist working so
fucking hard at the thought of you spread-eagled and fingering yourself.
Give me a visual. Now. Then I might reward you.
Needle&Thread: I’m exactly as you said. Begging, whimpering,
touching myself until my whimpers turn to pants and my begs turn to
moans. I’m wet for you. I’m hot for you. Please, Kite. Give me my fantasy.
Give me something warm to hold onto.
Kite : What the fuck is this about? How can I come when you sound
weird?
Needle&Thread: Weird? I’m not. I’m giving you what you want in
return for what I need.
Kite : Is that supposed to make sense, ‘cause I don’t understand
bullshit code. Fuck, you’re seriously making me do it.
Needle&Thread: Do what?
Kite : Ask you! Okay, fine. What’s got your panties so bunched that
you’re coming onto me so strong. What happened to my timid naughty nun?
Why the fuck do you sound so different?
I stared at my phone, heart rate skyrocketing. I’d tried to play it coy and
courageous. I thought I’d pulled off the pantomime that I was still myself,
still living my content but uninspiring life.
Obviously not.
I re-read my past replies, unable to see the difference. Had I changed
that much already?
There was nothing soft about Kite. There was no reason for me to seek
him out when I had enough bastard in my life thanks to Jethro. It made no
sense to let him use me—but it did in a strange way. It made sense because
I willingly gave him control over me—something I needed in my rapidly
spinning out of control life. While Jethro was determined to undermine,
throw away, and rule every inch of whatever little power I had left, Kite
gave it back in some strange, wonderful way.
He’s the monster I know. He’s not sweetness and light—but he’s mine
because I choose him to be. The defiance was yet another stupid score
against the beast called Jethro Hawk.
Straightening my back, I tried to figure out a way to possibly get Kite to
soften—just a little.
Kite : Tell me, then make me come. You’ve got two jobs to do. Do
them.
Taking a deep breath, I opened a fresh message.
Needle&Thread: Tell me if this is out of bounds, but in answer to your
question—why do I sound different—I suppose it’s because I feel different.
Everything is different. I thought I’d always fight against different. I like
normal. I like routine. I thought different would ruin me. But...then...I
changed.
Kite : Changed? You really going to make me drag this out? My cock
is hard and balls want to come. Spill it, so we can get to the second part of
your to-do list.
Needle&Thread: I’m the one who’s different now. It’s as if everything
I’ve been dealing with suddenly doesn’t matter. It’s just gone....
Kite : Gone?
Needle&Thread: Yes. It’s liberating, scary as hell, and confusing. But
something’s changing inside—it feels as if I’m...growing up.
I sighed. He’d send something horrible back—my response had been
too personal. I knew that. But I’d sent it anyway.
Kite : Out of bounds. Get back to the subject. Let’s try this, here’s
something you obviously want: I’m happy you’re growing up—makes me
feel a lot fucking easier knowing I’m not jerking off to a kinky fourteenyear-old. And now for want I want: I’m done with the cryptic crap. Pay
attention, because I’m sliding my cock into your mouth. You try to talk but
you choke on my length, your voice is humming against my balls. Stop
trying to communicate and settle in to your task. Suck me.
I sighed. Two emotions swirled inside—exasperation and gratefulness.
He’d replied to my overshare. He hadn’t shot me down or been the pillock
he usually was. Progress.
The tentative softness inside was enough to get me through the next few
hours.
Shouldn’t you want more?
My heart hardened.
Kite had replied to my veiled hints for encouragement but I’d hoped...
It doesn’t matter what I hoped.
It seemed everything I wanted in this world wasn’t available—including
more than one kind word from Kite. We’d been so close to a normal
conversation. Learning, sharing, building a connection despite the
complications of sexting.
He’d let me in for a microsecond then shut me out once again, using sex
as a tool to keep me in my place and remind me I didn’t factor in his life. I
was the unseen whore. The unpaid prostitute who lived in his phone.
I couldn’t let him hurt me. I couldn’t let him weaken me.
He’d done what I needed—reminding me I was strong enough. There
was nothing else to do but finish the conversation, so I could leave the soulsucking fantasy and return to the tragedy of my new world.
Kite : You’re not sucking. Fine, I’ll give you some encouragement. If
you blow me, I’ll return the favour. I’ll flip you onto your back, spread your
legs, and bury my face between your legs. I’d bite you, fucking you with my
tongue until you forgot everything and came.
My stomach attempted a small swoop. It wasn’t romantic, but it did give
me a tiny bit more warmth I needed.
Before I could reply, another message vibrated.
Kite : Tell me where you are right now. Are you naked? Finger
yourself for me. Take a photo if you’re brave.
I laughed. The sound shredded the space that Jethro had so kindly given
me for the night. Laughing was the only thing I could do. Take a photo? Of
what? The bruises on my palms from crawling to the kennels last night?
How about the cuts on my knees?
Maybe he wants a picture of my elegant bedroom and wonderful
bedfellows.
Looking up for the first time since I woke, I let the uselessness of my
situation get the better of me. The bravery I’d been clutching to like a raft in
a rolling ocean, splintered and drowned. Painful despair saturated my heart,
weighing me down like the anchors I so often clung to.
By all standards, the kennel was sheer luxury. The roof was watertight.
The floor clean and sanitary. It was even draft free.
But it wasn’t just mine. I had to share.
Squirrel, my favourite of the eleven canines I’d spent the night with,
nudged my arm. I’d named him after the tree-climbing rodent thanks to his
slightly bushy tail. With a doggy smile, he wheedled his way under my arm,
leaning heavily against my torso.
I’d never had pets growing up. As a family, we were too busy working
or travelling to exotic places to source more material and merchandise.
Until last night, I’d had an adolescent fear of dogs.
That had evolved to terror when Jethro threw me inside.
I shuddered, hugging Squirrel closer to me, stealing his gentle warmth.
Last night Jethro had tried to destroy me. Not through fists or rape or even
harsh words. No, he tried to destroy me by removing any entitlement I had
as a human. Marking me as no better than the dogs he kept.
He would’ve succeeded if my terror hadn’t mellowed into bewilderment
then gratefulness. He’d done me a favour—I preferred the company of his
hounds. They not only tolerated my intrusion but welcomed me into the
pack.
Squirrel licked my pebble-indented palm, letting me know he
understood my aches. I still suffered from crawling from the manor, past
immaculate flower beds, over precision mowed grass, and cutting through
shadows cast by imposing hedges.
Everything throbbed when I finally crawled the last metre and sat
waiting beside a large roller door. My dress was torn, my knees bleeding—
not that he’d cared.
The estate was bigger than I could contemplate, but even in the
darkness, I’d made out the buildings around us. The stables were across the
cobblestone yard. A granary let its soft grainy fragrance permeate the air.
The gentle huffing of horses broke the silence along with wuffles and
snuffles from dogs.
Jethro left me sitting on my knees while he disappeared into what I
assumed was a tack room. He returned with a large scratchy blanket and a
bucket, before unlocking the roller door and beckoning me inside.
Throwing the items into the dark interior, he bowed. “Your boudoir, my
lady.” Leaning down, he swatted my behind. “Go to bed like a good little
pet. You have a big day ahead of you.”
When I didn’t move, his foot landed on my arse, shoving me forward,
giving me no choice but to crawl quickly into darkness.
The moment I’d traded starlight for no light, I panicked.
Jethro threw the bolt home, locking me inside a room that thrived with
moving bodies, claws on cobblestones, and soft growls of ownership.
The first brush of a wet nose on my cheek ripped a small scream from
my lips. I curled tight into a ball, hugging my knees, squeezing my eyes
against being eaten alive.
I waited for sharp teeth.
But they hadn’t eaten me.
Far from it. I’d been licked and nuzzled and welcomed into a pack.
I was a stranger in their domain, but when I finally overrode my fear
and looked into their eyes, they were bright with curiosity rather than
territorial anger.
The rest of the night was spent making a semi-comfortable bed out of a
loosely packed hay bale, and wrapping myself tight in the scratchy blanket.
I’d aimed to sleep alone with my new friends scattered in their usual spaces,
but they had other ideas.
Once I was settled, they’d crowded around me, squeezing close, curling
around each other until I was the epicentre in a nest of canines.
The moment they’d quietened, I took out my phone.
Five missed calls, three messages from my twin, and one from my
father.
Biting my lip to retain what composure I could, I’d read my father’s
first.
ArchTextile: Nila, I know you’ll have questions. I know you’ll hate me.
But please, my wonderful girl, know I didn’t want any of this. I was stupid
not to heed your mother’s warning. I thought—well, it doesn’t matter what I
thought. I hope we can talk—when you’re ready. I understand if you can
never forgive me. I don’t know how much of this they’ll see, but I’ll never
stop searching, never stop hoping. Please don’t think I gave you up lightly.
They have...ways. They have you but they’ll keep you in good health. We
have time. Love you, sweetheart.
I didn’t want to focus on what time meant. The slow plod of time
intertwined with the fast tick, tick, ticking of my final heartbeats.
My fingers hovered on the reply button. But I couldn’t. Not yet.
Instead, I opened my brother’s messages.
VtheMan: Threads, pick up your goddamn phone.
VtheMan: Threads. I’m warning you. You’re not happy. I sense it. I’m
worried shitless and Tex is being a secretive arsehole. Call me immediately,
sister. Or I’ll make your life a living hell.
VtheMan: Please, Nila. Talk to me. Put me out of my misery. I miss you.
Love you so fucking much.
My teary gasp in the darkness pricked a few hounds’ ears. I’d wanted so
much to reply. But I didn’t dare. I didn’t trust myself not to beg him to get
me out of this. I was there of my own free will to protect him. I wouldn’t be
protecting him if I was weak.
I wanted hard facts on why the Hawks’ could do this. And I wouldn’t
stop until I knew everything.
Closing my messages, I opened up a picture of Vaughn and me that’d
been taken right before the doors opened to the show last night. The tiny bit
of strength I had left deserted me and I let go of my tight control.
I sobbed.
My heart expunged its grief through my eyes, drenching my cheeks,
blurring the last photo I had of my brother . I cried until dehydration
throbbed my head and my neck was sticky with salt.
A low battery reminder beeped. It was the hardest thing I’d done to shut
down the picture of V and turn it off.
More tears trickled and a hound raised his head, looking at me with
wise understanding. He inched forward on his belly, crossing the hay until
his claws tugged at my blanket.
His canine concern produced another torrent, but I opened my arms, and
with a wagging tail, he fitted himself around me like a living shield. His
doggy heart thudded against mine as I hugged his silky coat.
I went from the Darling of Milan with needle pricks on her fingers to
huddled on the floor with only hunting dogs for company.
A soppy tongue had licked my cheek, stealing the endless stream. And
that was when it happened. The change I’d told Kite about.  The ending.
The beginning. The freedom of just letting go.
All my life, I’d been stressed with making a name for myself, building
my career, loving my brother, being a worthy daughter. Bills. Deadlines.
Reputations. Expectations. It all balanced precariously on my shoulders,
moulding me into a quiet workaholic.
But at four a.m., in the kennels of the man who meant to kill me, I let it
all go.
I said goodbye to control. I waved farewell to everything that made me
live, but had also suffocated me, too. I didn’t have photo shoots to worry
about anymore. I didn’t have concerns on what to wear, where to be, how to
act.
All of that had been stolen. And there was no point crying or fighting
against it.
The moment I embraced the freedom of nothing, I stopped crying. My
headache left, and I drifted to sleep wrapped in the four legs of my new best
friend.
Squirrel nudged my hand, bringing me back to the present and the
waiting message from Kite. The past struggled to let me go, but I blinked,
dispelling my forlornness.
“He wants to know where I am. What should I tell him?” I asked my
entourage of hounds.
Foxhounds to be exact. Their black, tan, and white coats became visible
as the sun rose, glinting off their glossy fur. Their silky ears slapped their
pretty heads as they lopped around the enclosure, waking up as the sun
grew brighter.
They didn’t give me an answer.
Needle&Thread: Where I am right now doesn’t matter because I’m in a
fantasy with you. I’m in your bed. Naked.
It was much better than the truth. I focused on the huge roller door. I’d
checked last night to see if there was a way out, but of course, there wasn’t.
Kite : You took a while to reply. Did you pleasure yourself?
Throwing myself back into Kite’s sexual world, I replied.
Needle&Thread: I’m coming now. Both hands are between my legs,
feeling how wet I am. I’m crying out your name over and over. The
neighbours might hear me I’m so loud.
“Don’t tell him I released my tension by crying myself to sleep with you
in my arms.” Rubbing the head of Squirrel, I smiled. “And don’t tell him
I’ve never had an orgasm.”
The dog cocked his head, an expression of confusion on his face.
Kite : I like it when you talk dirty. Keep going. I have my cock in my
hand and want you to make me come.
My heart sped up. Reclining against the hay bale, I bit my lip. I’d never
made anyone come. The drunken night of losing my virginity didn’t count
because we were both so intoxicated it was a miracle he found the right
place to stick it in. After a few half-hearted thrusts, he’d rolled off me to
throw up, and I’d pulled up my knickers. I’d been silently horrified at the
blood on the sheets.
The copious amounts of alcohol had stolen any pain I might’ve felt
when he penetrated me. It’d also stolen the rush of entering womanhood,
swapping it with age-old regret.
The night definitely hadn’t been a success. Or the next day. Because no
matter how hard V tried to hide my hangover from Tex, he couldn’t prevent
me from vomiting on my dad’s shoes when he plucked me from my bed and
took me to the doctor.
I groaned in remembered embarrassment. “He found out, you know.” I
scratched Squirrel behind his large ear. “The doctor told him I’d been taken
advantage of. We’d used protection but it didn’t stop the endless STI tests
or pregnancy exams.” Another hound slinked closer, plopping next to me,
looking for a scratch. “That was the last time I was alone with a man other
than my dad or brother. Sad isn’t it?”
The dog panted, looking as if I’d told the world’s best joke.
Maybe Tex prevented you from dating, so when they came for you it was
only his heart you broke—not a husband or children.
The sudden thought stole my vision with horror.
Was the overprotectiveness to shield others? Had he kept me locked up
like some princess in a tower, all to stop me being my mother?
He’d fallen in love with my mother.
They’d had children young.
They’d come for her.
I rubbed my chest, unable to stop the epiphany shedding my father in a
new light. Was it selfish of him to protect me from living, knowing I was
destined an early grave? Or merely a tragedy that he prevented others
enduring heartbreak by loving me.
Vaughn.
He would sense the moment my life was snuffed out. We were linked
more than spiritually—but soul-glued and breath-bound. I’d known when
he broke his collarbone from kayaking. He’d known when I’d dropped my
heavy Singer sewing machine onto my foot.
Linked.
Don’t think about it. It hurt too damn much. Tears pricked my eyes but I
blinked them back, trying to remain in my false bubble of sexting. This was
all I had. I could flirt with Kite with complete safety, knowing I would
never be able to break his heart when the time came.
In a way, his fastidious request for distance protected him. And for that,
I was oddly grateful.
I smiled softly at Squirrel. “If a drunken whoopsy daisy was my only
attempt at making a man come, how the hell am I supposed to do it via a
faceless message?”
Be someone you’re not. Pretend.
“Fine.”
Swiping at the dirty mixture of hay, dog hair, and dust from the blanket
Jethro had given me, I prepared to embrace my inner sex-kitten.
Needle&Thread: Imagine your hand is my hand. I’m holding you firm,
tight. I’m kneeling at your feet while you sit on a large chair. A throne. Your
hand wraps in my hair, pulling me forward. I obey because I know what
you’re asking me to do. Your eyes don’t ask, they tell, and I lower my head
into your lap. You’re big. Smooth. Begging for my mouth.
My breath came faster; my mind playing out the fantasy in crystal
detail. The warmth I’d been looking for spread from my core like a
tentative sunrise.
Kite : Fuck me, woman. Why haven’t you been talking to me like that
all along? What was with the shy bullshit? Keep going. I’m so damn hard. I
want your mouth so fucking much.
My skin broke out in goosebumps. The power. The approval. Kite was a
wanker, an arsehole, and a complete shallow prick, but he approved of me.
He wanted me.
Needle&Thread: You’re holding your cock while I lick you once at the
very tip. You want me to swallow you, but you don’t force me. Because you
know I’m going to swallow every drop.
Kite : Did you taste it?
I frowned.
Needle&Thread: Taste what?
Kite : My precum. Fuck, I’m so close. I’m in your mouth. I’m fucking
your lips. I’m holding your hair as I drive so deep down your throat. What
do I taste like to you?
Needle&Thread: You taste...
“Hell, I don’t know.” Looking at the cluster of dogs, all watching me as
if they knew what I was up to, I swiped a hand over my face. “What the hell
does a man taste like?”
Needle&Thread: You taste of expensive liquor, making me drunk as you
come. Spilling over my lips, dripping down my chin. You don’t want me
wasting a drop, so you capture the liquid on your thumb and push it back
into my mouth.
The instant I sent it, a chill darted in my blood.
Thumb. Mouths. Sucking.
Him.
My taste buds brought back the crisp taste of Jethro. His unyielding
hold on my chin as I licked his finger. He hadn’t really had a taste. Just the
cold precision of stone. But having him dominate had given me the
permission to feel a flutter in my core, to not be embarrassed of wanting
more. Of becoming wet.
Kite : Fuck me. I haven’t come like that in a while. It’s all over me—
splashed up my chest, sticking to me like glue. I like you like this, naughty
nun. You’re more...relaxed.
My voice was soft. “That’s what happens when your life is no longer
your own and there’s nothing you can do to control your future.”
Squirrel yipped in agreement.
“That’s also what you do to survive. You become different. You
change.”
As much as I hated the Hawks, they’d given me something I’d been
searching for all my life.
My little kitten claws were growing, prickling. Still too new to scratch
with—but there.
My battery flashed again and I knew this would be the last time I’d have
the luxury of using it until Jethro let me charge.
Ignoring the emptiness inside and the sharp twinge of letting Kite use
me, I sent my last message.
Needle&Thread: I’m glad. I’m licking you clean. I’m drunk on
everything you’ve given me. I’ll be here for you when you next need a
release, but please...don’t call me naughty nun anymore. Call me Needle.

Jethro came for me at eleven a.m.
The horses across the yard were gone—to do what, I had no clue. I’d
spent an hour or so listening to the grooms prepare them and the comforting
clack of their metal shoes disappearing into the distance on cobblestones.
I pictured myself commandeering one and galloping away. Not that I
knew how to ride. I’d never had time. Sewing had been my one obsession.
Squirrel and his gang of hounds had left not long after I finished
messaging Kite. A piercing whistle summoned and they’d charged from the
kennel through a small dog-size exit down the back. I’d tried to follow—to
get free—but it only opened if a coded collar was in range. A password
programmed to every dog allowing them access.
So, I’d spent the remainder of my morning alone. Alone with thoughts I
flatly ignored.
It was odd to sit and do nothing. I had nowhere to rush off to. No emails
to reply to. No to-do list to attack. I was in limbo, just waiting for the man I
loathed to appear.
My stomach was a ball of knots wanting him to get it over with, whilst
my jangled heart wanted him to stay away forever. I’d never felt so jumbled
inside.
Hunger pangs growled for food—the empty ache only grew worse.
Jethro swung open the top partition of the barn door, leaving the bottom
closed. Resting his arms on the top, he nodded. “Ms. Weaver.”
The sun took the liberty of bouncing into the gloomy kennel,
silhouetting Jethro. His face remained in shadow but his thick hair was wet
and messy from a shower.
He’d shed his charcoal suit for a more casual grey shirt, the diamond
pin twinkling in his lapel. I’d grown to recognize it as his signature piece,
linking him to whatever organisation his father ran.
Is it a gang? Did they rob and cheat and kill?
It wasn’t my issue. I didn’t care. I was the innocent party—their
hostage.
I didn’t return his greeting, deciding to stay bundled in my blanket and
glower.
Jethro sniffed impatiently, removing his arms from the door. He
unlocked the bottom partition, swinging it wide.
More sunshine entered, illuminating the bottom half of his wardrobe.
Dark jeans. Well-fitted jeans. Jeans that made him seem young and
approachable and normal.
My hands balled. Don’t buy into the projection. There was nothing
normal about this man. Nothing sane or kind. I learned that last night—
many times over. There would be no more begging from me. No more
pleading. It fell on deaf ears, and I was done.
Jethro snapped his fingers as if expecting me to heel. “Get up. It’s time
to begin.” Taking a threatening step into the kennel, he pursed his lips.
“Shit, what did you do in your sleep? Roll around like the dogs?”
I kept my lips pressed together, watching him in the silence he so
seemed to enjoy. When I didn’t move, his face twisted, taking in my hayriddled hair and dirt-covered blanket. “I won’t tell you again. Get. Up.”
I shrugged. It was liberating to no longer care. To no longer be captive
by the need to obey and jump to attention for fear of retribution. I meant
what I said to Kite. Everything inside me was gone. Locked down,
bunkered inside, ready to weather whatever war was coming.
Standing slowly, I placed my dead phone into my jacket pocket. Letting
the blanket fall off my hips, I brushed lingering lint off my clothes.
Jethro snapped his fingers again, and I moved willingly—coasting to his
side exactly as he wanted.
He scowled, his gaze full of suspicion.
I gave him an empty smile. I’d found salvation in not caring. It didn’t
mean I had to pretend to like him. He wouldn’t know that by trying to break
me last night, he only gave me a new avenue of strength.
I’m ready.
For whatever he threw at me.
I’ll survive.
Until I no longer needed to try.
Running my hands through my hair, I quickly gave up with the tangles
and focused on pinching some colour into my cheeks instead.
“You think that will save you? Looking presentable?” His voice was
blizzard and snow.
I didn’t say a word.
Jethro gritted his jaw. His hands curled beside his spread legs.
My muscles braced for punishment. The air shimmered with violence.
Jethro’s hand suddenly shot out, capturing my throat. Without a sound,
he spun me around and marched me backward out of the kennel. The sun
kissed my skin, fanning the warmth I’d tried so hard to keep hold of from
talking to Kite. I embraced it, hugging it close, so Jethro’s ice didn’t slice
me into pieces.
His fingers tightened around my neck, but I refused to claw at his hold.
I repay in kind. Whatever I did to him in self-defence, I’d get back ten times
worse. But none of that mattered now, because I knew how to survive.
By being above them. By being untouchable on the inside, even while
they broke me on the outside.
“You think you’ve got it all figured out, don’t you?” His arm hoisted me
onto the tips of my toes. Breathing was difficult, not fighting was
impossible, but I permitted it. All I did was stare silently into his golden
eyes.
“I understand what you’re doing.” He smiled. “But mark my words.
You won’t win.” Shaking me, he unwound his fingers, then smoothed the
front of his jeans. The sun gleamed on the gold buckle of his belt.
My stomach clenched, but I held my ground. “Mark my words. I will
win. Because I am right and you are wrong.”
Jethro seethed, silence thick between us.
“You’re so high and mighty, aren’t you, Ms. Weaver? So sure you’re the
one in the right. What if I told you, your ancestors were scum? What if I
showed you proof of their corruptibility and eagerness to hurt others in their
chase for wealth?”
Lies. All lies.
My family tree was impeccable. I came from honest and good and
hardworking stock. Didn’t I?
I ignored my rushing heartbeat.
Jethro stepped closer, crowding me. “The things your family did to
mine sicken me. So continue on your quest believing you’re pure, because
in a few hours you’ll know the truth. In a few hours, you’ll realise we aren’t
the bad guys—it’s you.”
My throat closed up. I didn’t think he could say anything to crumble my
fortress so soon, but every word was a carefully planted spade, digging at
my foundation until I stood on crumbling ground.
My eyes danced over his, trying to decipher the truth.
Were my bloodlines tarnished with crimes I didn’t know about? My
father hadn’t exactly been forthcoming with our history, apart from telling
us our family had always been involved in weaving and textiles. It was how
we were granted the last name Weaver. Just like the Bakers, and the Butlers,
and every other trade that dictated their last names. 
Jethro chuckled. “Don’t believe me?” His hands landed on my
shoulders, pushing me backward. I stumbled, wincing as my spine collided
with the bricked wall of the kennel.
“Don’t believe your forefathers were sentenced to death by hanging for
what they did to mine?” His gaze latched onto my mouth. “Don’t believe
you’re alive because the Hawks granted them mercy in return for a few
signatures on a few debts?”
His voice dropped, sending a constellation of warning over my skin.
“Don’t believe I’m fully within my right to do whatever I damn well please
to you?”
His touch seared through my jacket and maxi dress, sending unwanted
intensity down my arms.
Do I believe it? Could I believe it? That everything I understood of this
situation was reversed?
Mind games. Illusions. All designed to trip me up.
Shaking my head, I snapped, “No. I don’t believe it.” My blood pressure
exploded, thundering in my ears. His focus was absolute, and it burned, oh
how it burned. “Nothing you say will make you the victim in this situation.
Nothing you show me will make this permissible. You think I believe a
ludicrous debt that you say is over six hundred years old. Wake up! Nothing
like that would hold up in a court of law these days. I don’t care that you’ve
staged my disappearance, or following my family with a loaded pistol. I
don’t believe any of this, and I certainly don’t believe you have anything
law abiding on your side.”
Jethro scowled, but I continued my tyrant.
“All I believe is you’re a bunch of sick and twisted men who made up
some bullshit excuse to make themselves feel justified while tearing other’s
lives apart. Show me where you have the right to own me. No one has that
right. No one!”
He chuckled, gold eyes growing dark. His body language switched from
stand-offish to oozing with sexual innuendo. It was like watching a glacier
melt, shedding winter for volcanic heat.
“I like it when you’re feisty. Your whole perception of the world is
warped. You live in a fairytale, princess, and I’m about to destroy it.”
His shoulders softened, lips parting; his gaze caressed my face to land
on my mouth. “You think we don’t have men in high places? Men who
make what we say absolute law? You think we got to the level of standing
in society or the obscene amount of wealth we have by not using the very
same law you think will protect you for our gain?”
His voice whispered over me, threading with his heady scent of woods
and leather. “So stupid, Ms. Weaver. We own more than your family. We
own everything and everyone. Our word is unbreakable. And we have
proof.”
He leaned in; the violence he emitted switched to dangerous lust,
buffeting me harder against the wall. His eyes were rivers of fire,
annihilating my argument, dragging me under his spell. “You think I can’t
make you do what I want?”
I sucked in a breath.
He’d never looked at me like that. Never given any hint he might find
anything about me exciting. He treated me like a leper. He looked at me as
if I were a different species—a species not evolved enough to warrant his
sexual attention.
But that’d changed.
His interest trapped me, consuming me better than threats and tightly
restrained anger. This was unexplored territory. Lust and attraction and
flirting were terrifying, because I was the novice and he was the expert.
I couldn’t fight against something that made me feel.
Jethro’s nostrils flared, fingers twitching on my shoulders. His voice
lowered to a husky whisper—a whisper best suited for seduction. “You
think you deserve a life built on other’s blood? You think you’re worthy?”
The rhythm and volume turned the horrible questions into a poem rather
than curse.
Don’t fall for it. Don’t let him win.
He was already winning. He spun a tale of a lethal, unstoppable force.
His family’s legacy somehow granted him police approval, government
blind-eyes, and the right over life and death.
Who gave him that right?
I still couldn’t believe it. But it didn’t stop my legs shifting, pressing
together, trying to alleviate the strange ache building with every moment.
Our fighting coaxed my unseen claws to grow a little more. My temper
made my legs firmer; my vision clearer. My body unknowingly found a
cure from dreaded vertigo, all while embracing anger and rage.
Jethro noticed my tension, stroking my shoulders as if I were a skittish
prey. “We’re simple creatures, Ms. Weaver. I know what’s happening to
you.” He smiled gently, his gold eyes attempting to look soft, but unable to
hide the steel beneath. “Your skin is hot. You’re breathing faster.”
He ducked his head, murmuring, “You like this. You like being pushed
past your limits.”
I shook my head. “You’re wrong. There’s nothing about you that I like.”
He sighed, his gaze whispering over my mouth. “Lying won’t work. I
know you’re growing wet for me, wanting me.” His touch morphed from
menacing to lightning, sending a rain of sparks through my blood. “Want to
know how I know? Because I taste it in the air. I smell it all around you. I
feel it.”
My lips parted. My chest rose and fell, increasing faster and faster. I
couldn’t look away; I couldn’t push him away. I couldn’t do anything but
revel in the intoxicating, melting, glowing, sparking need building rapidly
in my core.
Closing my eyes, I swallowed hard, trying so hard to dispel the sick and
twisted desire he conjured. “I’m—I’m not.”
He ran his thumbs over my shoulders, following my collarbone with
infinite softness. “You’re not?” he breathed. “You’re not feeling the rush of
lust or the knowledge you’d throw all your rules away for
just...one...little...taste?” His lips came so close to mine, pulling away in the
ultimate tease.
Yes. No. I don’t know.
I’d lost control of my body, hurtling straight for a cataclysm where
everything was hot and sharp and intense.
I didn’t have an answer. I didn’t know what he wanted.
He’s fucking with your mind. That’s all he’s doing.
His thumbs stroked higher, smoothing away the bruises he’d caused on
my neck. “Tell me you’re not wet for me. Say it.”
I shook my head, willing the words to come. “I’m not. I’m...”
“What?” Jethro murmured.
The ache grew stronger, sending a rush of dampness against my
knickers. My body didn’t care this was a monster. My body didn’t care
about the future. All it cared about was curbing the intolerable need.
Opening my heavy eyes, I said, “I’m not wet. Not for you.”
My hands balled, fighting against the thick intoxication. I couldn’t let
him steal the warmth from Kite. He’d already turned the small flame into an
out of control inferno, cindering my morals, turning my hatred to ash. I
couldn’t fall into his web—he’d eat me alive.
But, one kiss...would it be so wrong?
To take something from him when he’d already taken so much from
me?
I swayed closer, unconsciously seeking everything he dangled before
me. I wasn’t equipped to play these games. I was naïve and woefully
unprepared for combat where lust was used as the weapon.
“You’re a little liar, Ms. Weaver.” He dropped one hand from my
shoulders, tracing my contours until he captured my hip, the other skated
upward, cupping my cheek. Every millimetre he travelled sent sparks along
my skin unlike anything I’d ever felt before.
His tongue appeared, licking his lips. “You want this.” His knee nudged
against mine, forcing my legs to spread. “You want something you know
you shouldn’t.” With seamless authority, he pressed against me, tilting his
hips into mine.
I shivered. Hating him. Lusting for him. Hating myself. Loving the
forbidden rush.
The reasons for our fight flew away on soundless wings, leaving me
with no argument against the swelling swollen ache.
“All that separates my cock from your pussy is a few fragile pieces of
clothing.” He drove upward, grinding himself punishingly. “You won’t stop
me.” There was no space, no secrets—our bodies glued together.
My mind went blank with sheer-numbing pleasure. I felt every ridge
and contour of him. From the pressure of his shoe against mine to the hot
heat in his jeans growing larger every second.
You know what he intends to do. Stop this, I screamed at my betraying
body. But it replied in force with a clenching ripple, turning my legs to
jelly. 
I held my breath. His hard body was as unmovable as the wall I stood
trapped against. His ripped stomach pressed against mine.
I wasn’t cushy or curvy. I had no feminine attributes—I’d exercised
away any hope at softness.
But it only amplified the intensity.
There was nothing to cushion the firmness of bones and sinew and
craving flesh. It was visceral. All consuming.
“Tell me again you’re not wet for me.” His hooded eyes imprisoned
mine. “Tell me another lie.”
I tried to look away, but he thrust again, enticing another ripple of
pleasure. I hadn’t planned on being the innocent girl. The stuck-up princess
who never self-pleasured or enjoyed men. I hated that I came across
priggish, uptight, and repressed. Those traits were a hazard of my
upbringing, and I desperately wanted to turn them into weapons.
I wanted to use them as effortlessly as Jethro wielded his wintery
charisma.
My body knew what it wanted. It wanted a release. It wanted to satiate
and be sated. And it didn’t give a flying arse who granted the freedom of
the mysterious orgasm. I knew who Jethro was—I knew this was all a game
to him. But why couldn’t two people play? Why did I have to justify his
touch as bad when it was so amazingly good?
Death was coming. Shouldn’t I try to live before I died?
For once in my life.
Be true and honest and raw.
Why can’t I use him? Just once be the bad girl and use the monster. Win
by not fighting. Be stronger by giving in.
My pussy grew bolder, taking my unvoiced permission and growing
wet, greedy, eager to experience the cock pressed firmly against me.
I...can’t.
You can.
I...won’t.
You will.
Jethro ducked, nipping my jaw with sharp teeth.
I unlocked my chastity belt, and melted into him. I arched my back,
deliberately pressing my breasts against his chest.
His seduction lost the calculating edge, his breath went from calm to
uneven.
Something new broke free inside. Some level of embarrassment of sex
—the unapproved thoughts of being used—disappeared. I was a business
woman. A daughter. A sister. The fantasies inside weren’t the thoughts of a
puritan.
Deep inside, where I never let myself go, a sexual deviant lurked. A
woman who was bold and angry. A woman beyond ready to admit she’d
hidden so much of herself—even from herself.
Jethro’s hand moved to grab the back of my neck. His hips pulsed; his
heart thudded hard, vibrating our tightly pressed forms.
I shivered in his hold, giving in completely to the clench between my
legs.
“Answer me. Tell me the truth.” His mint-fresh breath fluttered my
eyelashes as he hovered possessively over my lips. Only a tiny space
between a tease and a kiss. Only a fraction between right and wrong.
Do it. Accept it.
He paused, murmuring into my mouth, “Tell me a secret. A dirty, dark
secret. Admit you want me. Admit you want your mortal enemy.”
I admit it.
“I won’t.” My heartbeat switched from thumping to humming; my skin
prickled with heat.
I hated him. I wanted to kill him before he killed me. But I couldn’t
ignore the overwhelming attraction he’d created. And it wasn’t just me
affected. His breathing turned ragged; his fingers dug deeper with need.
Every pulse of his hips drew a quickening in my core. I couldn’t control it. I
didn’t want to control it. I was done controlling my life.
I’m free.
The longer we stood, the further we blurred the lines between debtor
and debtee. Weaver and Hawk. In that tiny moment, we were each other’s
answer to freedom. A mind-blistering coupling that would surely ruin me
for life. But at least I would’ve lived.
I looked deep into Jethro’s burning eyes, transmitting everything I
suffered. I hate you for making me acknowledge this part of myself.
His face tightened; his body slammed harder against mine. Whispering
his lips over my cheek, bringing them low, lower, lower, the tip of his
tongue tasted the corner of my mouth.
My world disintegrated with an ecliptic bang.
I trembled, eyes snapping closed on their own accord.
His hand on my hip shot downward, disappearing between our bodies.
I gasped, jolting in his hold as his fingers scrunched up my dress,
shoving it out of the way as if it were nothing. My gasp turned to a ragged
moan as he cupped me bold and strong. My gaze flew wide, locking onto
his.
Never had something felt so good. So bad. So intensely delicious.
His gold eyes turned to a burnt sunset, filling with fire as he fingered
my knickers. “Do you think you’re so perfect you wouldn’t scream my
name? Do you think you’d be able to say no if I dragged you into the
kennel and fucked you?” His fingers bit into my pussy, hot and punishing.
“Because I want to. Fuck, how I want to. I want your screams. I want you
begging.”
I lost myself completely, throwing myself into this new creation. The
one who had the power to do this and still retain her heart. The one who
would give Jethro her body because she wanted it. Not him.
His fingers scattered my thoughts, probing against the thin satin of my
underwear. His touch was electrifying. I wanted more. I wanted everything.
I stepped off the cliff. “No. I’m not so perfect. And yes, I would
scream.” Clawing at his shoulders, I forced myself deeper onto his hand.
“You think I’m immune? You think I’m dry and repulsed by you?”
Dragging him closer, I murmured, “You couldn’t be more wrong.”
Jethro’s nostrils flared. His fingers twitched as he narrowed his eyes.
“You think you can confuse me?”
I pressed a finger against his mouth. “Shut up.”
His eyes popped wide; he growled low in his chest. His lips pulled back,
revealing sharp teeth.
I didn’t remove my finger. I was in charge. I was the one taking. “My
heart hates you, but my body....I’m drenched. I’m begging. So stop your
endless questions. Stop taunting me and deliver.”
Kite flew into my mind, then was gone. I’d surpassed awkward sexting,
embracing physical coyness.
The world paused for a millisecond.
Jethro sucked in a shocked breath. Then his hand left my pussy, tore the
small stitches holding my knickers in place, and drove one finger so damn
deep inside me, I did what I said I would.
I screamed.
My head fell back, smashing against the wall. My heart exploded into a
mess of passion and rage.
Oh, God. Oh, God.
My mouth sucked in air, but it didn’t stop the swirling, blinding need
stealing my remaining sanity, giving me completely and utterly to Jethro. I
cried inside. I wailed inside. I wished I could be different. Someone not so
deprived of her animalistic needs. Someone who could scream and call for
help. Not someone who tilted their hips and moaned at the curses spilling
from Jethro’s lips. Not someone who gripped the man who tore her from
her world and opened her legs wider.
But then Jethro touched a spot that made my muscles lock and a need so
violent to seize. I grabbed his wrist, forcing him to take me harder. My tears
turned to joy, writhing on Jethro’s hand.
“Fuck. Me.” His voice was sex-gruffed and so low it echoed over
cobblestones. “Who the hell are you?” His finger worked me, pulsating
deep inside.
I opened my legs as wide as I could. I gave up on everything, embracing
the simplicity of being a sexually starved creature.
This wasn’t making love. This wasn’t even fucking. This was war. And
hell it felt good.
Digging my fingernails into his shoulders, I jerked him closer. “Harder.”
Jethro groaned, and in a twist of fate—obeyed. His finger drove so deep
his knuckles nudged against my swollen flesh. His thumb swirled around
my clit, smearing wetness, taking me to ever new heights.
I turned to stone before detonating into tiny pieces. Every inch of my
thoughts, emotions, and reactions were stolen by his mind-blowing touch. I
hadn’t felt anything like it.
Guilt tried to claim me, reminding me this was the man who ruined my
life. But lust quickly devoured the guilt, turning it to raging passion.
“You’re so fucking tight,” he growled, thrusting his finger harder.
I felt as if I’d not been living. As if my world was dark and Jethro was
the sun bringing me nutrition I never knew I needed.
A painful pressure burned as he tried to fit two fingers inside me.
I flinched, rocking my hips away. “Stop—”
He paused, then removed the second digit, driving a single finger deep,
dragging me back to willing. “You’re a virgin. The rumours were true.”
I shook my head. “No.”
“No?” He grabbed my chin, holding me firm, driving his finger harder. I
cried out, letting my head loll on my useless neck with bliss. “How are you
this tight and not a virgin?”
“Once. I only—” I stopped, consumed with every pulse of Jethro’s
finger. “I’m—”
I gave up.
I was completely illiterate.
“If you’re not a virgin, prove it.” His fingers tightened around my chin.
“Pull out my cock.”
My mind blanked out. I hung onto the precipice of my good girl ways
before throwing myself head first into a woman who would do anything to
feel alive.
“Pull out my cock, Ms. Weaver.” He thrust against me, battering me
with the hardness in his jeans.
My eyes flared wide. My stomach hollowed out at the same time it
swooped upright as he thrust his finger.
“Goddammit,” he growled. “Do it. I’m not going to come in my jeans
like an idiot.”
Would he fuck me? If I took out his cock, would he take me?
Sex? With him?
I...
I couldn’t have sex with him. This cold-hearted monster. But my raging
heart and bubbling blood said yes. God, yes. 
Shutting off my thoughts, I dropped my hands from his shoulders and
fumbled with the buckle of his belt.
The hardness of his erection burned my fingertips. Jethro didn’t help my
concentration, driving his touch deeper. “Hurry up. I need your sweet
fingers jerking me off. Goddammit, I don’t know—” His voice cut off as I
undid his button and zipper.
I gasped as his cock sprang out, escaping the top of his grey boxerbriefs. He shuddered, groaning in relief. The tip glistened with wetness,
slightly red, slightly swollen.
My eyes grew wide, fear chasing away the lust in my veins. I looked up,
swallowing hard. “You’re...I can’t—”
He scowled. “Too late to back out now, woman.” Grabbing my hand, he
placed it roughly around his thick, hard massive cock. I had no experience
to go on, but he would never fit inside me. He wouldn’t fit inside any
woman.
“Shut up and stroke me.”
I opened my mouth, unable to form words. “It can’t—there’s no way—”
In a lightning fast move, he jerked his finger from my core, smearing
my dampness on my cheek as he pinched me hard. “You’re out of excuses,
Ms. Weaver. You were the one who started this. You’re the one who rode
my finger as if you’d never come before.” His voice dropped to a dark
whisper. “So shut up, wrap those little fingers around my cock and stroke
me; otherwise, I swear to God I’ll throw you on your hands and knees and
fuck your tight little cunt right here.”
My heart lurched. There wouldn’t be anything erotic about that. It
would hurt. He would split me in two.
Biting my lip, I cupped the exposed head, spreading the sticky residue
at the top down his hot shaft. Locking eyes with Jethro, I pushed my hand
into his boxers, following his long, long length.
His eyes snapped closed as my timid fingers latched round him.
“Fuuuuck,” he groaned. His forehead smashed against mine, hips pulsating
into my hand. “Stop taunting me. Harder, goddammit.”
That was asking for the impossible. I couldn’t get my fingers to connect
around his girth. My grip was useless around the throbbing heat—the only
hot part of him. Holding my breath, I wrapped my hold as hard as I could.
Jethro grunted. “Squeeze it. Stop being a fucking tease. Was I teasing
you?” His hand suddenly disappeared up my dress again, his middle finger
thrusting so hard and quick inside me, he sent a galaxy of stars exploding
behind my eyes.
Then he glided upward, smearing the wetness around my clit. My legs
tried to scissor closed; all my attention shot between my legs.
I went rigid. Having him touch me was amazing. Having him rub that
small bundle of nerves was incredible.
“Return the favour, Ms. Weaver. Make me come. Right here. Right now.
And I'll drive you so wild, you’ll beg and never want anyone else.”
Coming. The blissful end of sex. Was that what the sharp sensation
was? Growing tighter and tighter in my core? If it was, I wanted to come.
Badly.
Winding my fingers as tight as possible around his girth, I squeezed
until a jagged pain erupted down my palm. I didn’t have the strength. I
didn’t know what to do. Did I just squeeze and let him thrust into my hand?
What else was expected?
With a low growl, Jethro stopped stroking my clit. He turned to granite.
“That’s your idea of making me come?”
I swallowed, jerking my hand away. The thrill of being touched and
touching faded, rapidly replaced with despair. “I’m—yes...uh.”
“For fuck’s sake.” Rolling his eyes, he removed his hand from between
my legs and stepped back. With a grunt, he yanked his trousers back into
place, but not before I caught a glimpse of just how huge his cock was. It
was flawlessly straight, veiny, silky, so proud and rigid—just like its owner.
It terrified me.
“Fuck, what was I thinking? You’re useless. Completely useless.”
Buckling his belt, he ran his hands through his hair, smearing the lingering
wetness from me through his silvering strands. “Huge disappointment, Ms.
Weaver.” His cold glare sent a snowstorm wiping away the bonfire in my
belly. “I’m done playing games, so cut the bullshit. Time to begin the day.”
His voice gave no room for interpretation. A cold draft shot down my back.
My brief reprieve from debts and horrible Hawks was over. I’d been
shown something I desperately wanted, but was denied it because I failed to
please him.
“You could teach me...show me how...” I couldn’t make eye contact
with him. Mortification painted my cheeks for both admitting I was clueless
and asking a monster to coach me.
Jethro laughed. “You think that will save you from what’s coming? Was
that your little plan? To make me fuck you in the hopes I might feel
something for you?” He shook his head. “I’m not teaching you anything—
especially how to jerk me off. As you told me once—Google that shit—but
it won’t do you any good, because next time...I won’t need your hand to
come.”
My breath caught in my throat.
My heart hung heavy and I shivered. The sun crept behind a cloud,
leaving us in haunting shadows.
Jethro stood glaring, the outline of his erection visible in his jeans. But
there was no hint of the lust he’d suffered, or the passion that blazed
between us only seconds before. His unfeeling eyes burned a hole straight
into my soul, condemning me for my past treasons and present failures. The
longer he stared, the more he undermined my carefully built fortress.
I couldn’t stand the intensity any longer. The humiliation of standing
there unwanted, slightly used, and entirely frustrated. With shaking hands, I
smoothed down my dress and pushed away from the wall. Without a word,
I flicked my hair over my shoulder and skirted around him. With confident
steps, I left him behind, heading toward the manor.
He’ll chase. He’ll hunt.
I expected to land on my face from a carefully planned strike. I waited
for vertigo to steal my quiet assurance and spiral me to the ground. But
nothing happened.
Jethro didn’t pounce, and I didn’t fall.
I was steady for the first time in my life.
My world continued even though I’d been thrown off my axis and into a
brand new realm. A realm where sex beckoned like the Holy Grail and my
self-hatred magnified a thousand fold.
My empty stomach threatened to steal the remaining strength in my
limbs, but I kept going, ignoring my body’s protests, walking like a good
little animal to the slaughter.
I didn’t think I was about to enjoy my penance of being a Weaver.
Balling my hands, I made a promise. A promise I hoped would grant me
strength for the coming days.
They can’t touch me. I’m not Nila or Threads. I’m done being weak.
My heart swelled as I crested the hill, staring at Hawksridge Hall in all
its glory. I shed my kitten baby-fur and embraced a new pelt. One that filled
me with fight. One that embraced the elongating claws I’d begun to grow.
I was no longer protected by tigers but forced to become one.
I’m Needle, and I will survive.
Jethro.
CONTROL.
I loved it.
I wielded it.
I owned it.
But that little Weaver broke my control, turning me into nothing more
than a sex-driven idiot. She’d made me throw my decorum, calmness, and
carefully laid plans out the goddamn window.
Her timid fingers. Her fluttering breaths. They’d been more of a turn on
than the most experienced of lovers. She was so fucking pure she choked on
a halo.
And to ask me to teach her? Granting me power by evolving this
virginal creature into anything I damn well wanted?
It was temptation.
It was not fucking permitted.
She was mine to take from. Mine to share.
I refused to train her, because in the end I would be the one delivering
the killing blow. She wouldn’t succeed in dragging me into whatever game
she played.
I breathed hard, even now struggling to find my beloved coldness. I
needed an icy shower. I need to teach her a fucking lesson—that’s what I
need.
A knock snapped my head up. I spun in place, trading the view of the
front gardens to glare at my father. The man who’d taught me how to be the
master of my emotions. How to rein in the uncouth part of ourselves and be
ruthless with silence. He’d taught me the most—beaten me the most—and I
was his favourite.
Thank God there were no cameras by the stables—if he saw how far I
fell, his disappointment would bring repercussions. Big repercussions.
My father popped his head into the ‘Buzzard Room’ named for the
hand-stencilled wallpaper of hunting buzzards and the mounted carcasses of
ducks, swans, and small birds.
It was also the room I’d picked for Nila. This would be her quarters—a
room stinking of death and decay.
She’d somehow won the lesson I wanted to teach her at the kennels.
She’d managed to make me trade control for the promise of sex. It had
worked.
It. Would. Not. Work. Again.
I pitied her really. She’d shown me so much in that brief moment. She
was hungry. She was hidden. And she was so damn vulnerable it made me
smile to think of her illusions. She thought she could outsmart us.
Us?
Diamond merchants, biker royalty, and proven masters of the Weaver’s
fate.
Stupid, stupid girl.
I nodded at my father. “Cut.”
His grey goatee bristled. “Bring her into the dining room when she’s
ready. Everyone’s gathered.” He puffed on a giant cigar, wearing a tweed
waistcoat and trousers complete with a leather jacket from the Black
Diamonds. He looked an enigma of motorcycle world and English
aristocracy.
I nodded again.
He left without a goodbye, and I moved to sit on the seventeenth
century hand-carved brooding chair. A chair made for men and only men.
Complete with ashtray, newspaper stand, and heavy, dark brocade designed
with our family crest.
Ten minutes later, the door to the ensuite bathroom opened, revealing a
freshly showered Nila. Her long black hair draped like ink on her naked
shoulders. She looked younger, innocent without the heavy makeup
smeared from last night. Her eyes were bigger, like black unhappy pools
whilst her skin glowed a natural dusky tan.
I’d seen her in magazines. I’d run a fingertip over her snapshot in the
fashion columns, but never found her attractive. She didn’t have breasts.
She always stood like a fading shadow next to her brother and looked too
prim and stuck up.
She was nothing to me.
Then why did I almost come while fingering her?
My mouth watered, remembering the wildness lurking beneath that uptight-virgin bluff.
I swallowed, battling the blood rushing to my dick. The way she rode
my hand—fuck.
Then I laughed. Out loud.
Waving at her tiny hands clutching the towel, I said, “I see your fingers
are capable of holding something.” My head cocked. “Do I need to remind
you what a disappointment earlier was?”
She was nothing to me before, and she would remain nothing to me.
And after this afternoon, there would be no way in hell she’d ever let me
touch her again.
Which was perfect, because the next time wouldn’t be for pleasure. It
would be for pain. And permission would take the control away.
She froze, locking her knees. The heavy cloud when she suffered a
stupid balance attack swirled in her eyes. Sucking in a breath, she said
quietly, “No, you don’t. You’ve told me countless of times. You’ve made
me very aware of what you think of me, and I’m sick of hearing it.”
I took my time glancing down her body.
She didn’t fidget or blush, which pissed me off. I wanted her nervous. I
wanted her terrified of what was to come.
I stood up slowly, clicking my tongue. “Ah, ah, ah, Ms. Weaver. Don’t
take that tone with me. You’re the failure. You’re the prisoner. You take
what I give you. You do not assume to have any say or authority. That
includes listening to everything I deem important to tell you.” Ghosting to a
stop in front of her, I murmured, “Is that quite understood?”
I flexed my muscles, welcoming back the soothing chillness of control.
I hadn’t liked stepping outside my confines of civility. Things got messy
when silence was disrupted. Things got rushed when tempers rose and
curses flowed.
And I couldn’t handle that.
Running a fingertip along her damp shoulder, I smiled at her flinch.
“Did you do as I asked and wash your filth away?”
Her lips pursed, anger glowing in her eyes. But she swallowed it down,
muting the light. “Yes.”
“Did you leave your pussy alone? No trying to finish what I started?”
Her head hung a little lower. “Yes.”
My finger followed the contour of her shoulder, tracing down her arm.
She stood silently, hiding the wild creature from before, depicting quiet
sexuality and vulnerability. My mouth watered again, but it wasn’t with
need to shove her against the wall and drive my dick inside her. No, it was
because I’d never made someone with her skin colour bleed. Would her
blood be darker? Would it be a rich chocolate like her eyes?
I knew her family tree. I’d studied it in preparation. Her bloodlines
weren’t pure—there was mixed race in her past. A blend of Spanish and
English. Another reason why Hawks were better. We were one hundred
percent English stock. Unsullied.
Nila looked into my eyes. Her skin broke out in goosebumps. “Stop
whatever you’re doing and let me get dressed. Where are my clothes?” She
clutched the silver towel harder, hiding everything but her longer than
average legs and tiny feet. “I need to charge my phone. I want my suitcase.”
I didn’t bother caring who’d she’d texted last night to drain her battery.
There would be no cavalry coming to her rescue—of that I was completely
sure. “You’ll receive your belongings if you please us.”
“Us?”
Stepping back, I smoothed my shirt, taking my time in delivering the
truth. I hoped she’d move away—run even. But she locked her knees again,
standing firm on the thick mahogany carpet.
“Yes. Us.” Holding out my palm, I waited. “Take my hand.”
She hesitated, hoisting her towel higher, her tiny fist jammed against her
small breasts.
I looked forward to making her obey, but then the aloofness I’d briefly
witnessed in the kennels came over her features—blotting out the fire,
turning her into an obedient robot.
Slowly she did as I requested, placing her slightly damp hand in mine.
The moment I had her, I marched across the bedroom floor. She gasped,
jerked into motion, her legs darting to keep up. Silently, I wrenched open
the door and stalked down the huge corridor, past shields and lances and
crossbows, to the end of the bachelor wing where the Black Diamond
brotherhood met once a week in a club meeting called the Gemstone.
This afternoon, it wasn’t business being discussed. It was Nila.
This was her welcome luncheon.
A tradition unbroken for hundreds of years. An esteemed event that all
our brethren knew.
The day they all sample a Weaver.
Slamming my palm against the double doors, I jerked Nila into the
room. She wheeled to a stop, her face losing its colour in favour of snowy
white. I searched her features for fear. I hunted for terror, but I only
witnessed blank resignation.
Turning away from her, I focused on what she couldn’t look away from.
Men.
Some smooth faced and young, others bearded and old. But they all had
something in common. They belonged to the Diamonds and were our most
trusted employees. Flaw, Fracture, and Cushion weren’t present. Their task
was to watch Vaughn and Archibald Weaver from doing anything...reckless.
Nila struggled, trying to take her hand back. I clamped my fingers
around her, not giving an inch. “Don’t be rude, Ms. Weaver. Say hello and
be courteous. This is, after all, your welcome lunch.”
She jolted, shying backward, testing my hold.
My father sat at the end of the extremely long table. The room was
huge. Decorated with gold-spun drapery and massive oil paintings of my
ancestors, it glittered with crystal chandeliers and silverware.
The paintings were of male Hawks only. The women of my family tree
were designated to another room. Still celebrated, but not nearly as
important. 
Each artwork showed a man of distinguished wealth and intolerable
power. I’d studied them in great length this past month, preparing for Nila’s
arrival. My favourite was Owen Hawk.
I looked just like him.
Snapping his fingers, my father called the small murmurs of masculine
voices to attention. Pointing at Nila trembling beside me, he said, “Brothers,
this woman will be our guest for the foreseeable future, and in honour of
her company, we have something special planned.”
The men grinned, reclining in their chairs, ready for the show to begin.
The hiss and crackle of the log fire added a cheery background noise as
well as welcome heat to the cavernous room.
“Jet, if you would be so kind as to make sure our guest is appropriately
attired.”
Pleasure.
Tradition had begun.
Dropping Nila's hand, I moved toward the large side table that held
crockery, wine glasses, and decanters. The food that’d been prepared by the
full kitchen in the other wing of the house waited on the matching sideboard
across the room. There were countless dishes, at least seven courses, but no
wait staff to present it.
I smiled.
That was where Ms. Weaver came in. Along with...other duties.
Gathering the items that were meant for Nila, I returned to her side. She
hadn’t moved, but not from obedience. Two large men in leather cuts
blocked her way out. The moment I came back, she looked pleadingly into
my eyes.
“I can’t—Jethro, don’t make me.” She swallowed. “Not so many. I can’t
do—”
Snatching her arm, I spun her to the corner of the room, away from
hungry onlookers. “You dare say no? Do you want this to be over?”
She nodded rapidly. “Yes. More than anything yes.”
“Fine. It’s over. But you’re sentenced to watch your father and brother
be slaughtered, along with the decimation of your family’s business and
assets. It will be obliterated. Gone. Is that what you’re willing to pay?”
She squeezed her eyes in horror.
Didn’t think so.
I never wanted to be that weak. That driven by compassion. I obeyed
my family. I accepted my position. But I would never let love dictate my
actions.
That wasn’t what a Hawk did.
We were untouchable.
Taking the liberty of her lack of vision, I placed the first item on her
head. A sexy, frilly maid’s cap. It perched on her head, gracing her damp
black hair like a sad crown.
Her head dipped, shielding her eyes. Her body convulsed, trying hard to
maintain the blankness she thought would be her salvation.
Tugging her hands, I muttered, “Let go of the towel.”
She cowered away.
Growling under my breath, I wrapped an arm around her waist, holding
her firm. “Don’t make me ask again. You’re not new to this game. Let go of
the towel.”
Her eyes flew wide, fighting my hold. “No!”
Goddammit, she tested me. A headache brewed behind my eyes. I
sighed. “Make me ask you one more time. Go on...”
She froze, breathing hard. A battle broke out between us. I should never
have let her get away with what she pulled at the stables. She thought I’d
softened. She thought I’d be lenient. If anything, she’d proven my errors
and I’d go above and beyond to ensure I didn’t falter again.
Ever.
She had to learn that the day granted hope and happiness, but I stole it.
She had to face that the night hid evil and darkness, but my soul was
blacker.
There would be no winning. None.
We didn’t speak, but our eyes shouted, wrapping us tight with unsaid
tension.
Finally, she lowered her chin in defeat. Her death grip on the fluffy
material loosened, allowing it to flutter to the floor.
Ordinarily, I would’ve rewarded her. A kind word. A gentle gesture. But
that was before I learned I couldn’t give her any softness. She needed a
firm, masterful hand. Otherwise, she’d make my life a living hell until I
stole hers.
My eyes latched onto her naked body.
I paused.
Fuck.
Nila Weaver was like the needle she used to make her livelihood. Long,
sculptured. Muscle tone so defined, her hips defied her supple skin, almost
piercing her. Her breasts were small but high with perfect dark nipples.
My gaze dropped between her legs. The part of her I’d intimately
explored already. I expected an inexperienced girl to not maintain her pussy,
but there was only a strip of black hair, hiding and teasing at the same time.
My heartbeat thickened.
And then I noticed the bruises.
Everywhere. On her ribcage, hips, thighs, and arms.
I prodded at a particularly large purple one. “Who did this?”
She crossed her knees, clamping a hand over her breasts.
I swallowed hard, hating that my cock twitched.
Her mouth parted, then understanding flared. “Not who. What.”
Looking down at herself, she whispered, “The perils of vertigo.”
I had no reply to that. She already had a condition that hurt her.
I hated that I understand that...more than she knew.
“Put your arm down.” I slapped it away from her breasts. She stiffened,
but left it by her side, standing taller than before.
Holding out the tiny excuse of an apron, I placed it over her head. It was
black with white lacy trim, low enough to show the tops of her breasts and
nipples, short enough to show the trimmed delight between her legs.
Spinning her around, I tied the strings at her neck and lower spine.
When she faced me again, she choked, “Why?”
“Why?” I raised an eyebrow.
“Is this all a game to you?”
I smiled. “No game. We’re deadly serious. As you should know by
now.” Leaving her, I returned to the table and collected the final item. The
Weaver heirloom.
Prowling back to her, I held up the collar.
Her eyes popped wide. She gawked at the solid encrusted diamond
collar made from our very own imports. Two hundred carats, valued at over
three million pounds—it’d been in my family since the first debt had been
claimed.
“Do you know what this is?” I dangled it in front of her face.
She clamped her lips, eyes deathly cold.
I didn’t need a reply. She’d know soon enough.
Unlocking the collar, I held the two ends and bent over her. Wrapping it
around her throat, I moved from front to back, positioning myself to fasten
it. I kept my voice low and soothing, embracing my cold ruthlessness again.
“It’s affectionately known as the Weaver Wailer.” Using the special clasp—
an irreversible clasp—I murmured, “It’s your gift from us. Jewels from the
best of our mines. You should be proud to wear such wealth.”
Nila shivered as the lock snapped into place.
My shoulders relaxed. It was on. It was done.
Her option to leave had just disappeared.
“You’re ours now. Want to know why?”
She whimpered, shaking her head.
Gathering her thick black hair, I ignored her plea for ignorance. I’d told
her ignorance was bliss—which was true. But my job was to torment her.
She had to fully embrace her future.
Breathing gently on her neck, I whispered, “Because once the Weaver
Wailer is in place...there’s only one way to get it back off.”
Nila.
“ENOUGH PLAYING, JETHRO, bring her here.”
The command burned my ears, turning my false belief I could survive
into dirty soot. The fire I’d nursed inside was gone. All the stupid
pretending that I could block the worst from damaging my soul
disappeared. My little claws had fully retracted into nothing once again.
I was cold. Cold as him.
Shut down. Same as him.
Silent. Same as him.
Only one way to get it off.
I swallowed. My head pounded. My hands flew up to tug at the jewelled
collar. It was heavy and lifeless and ice. Pure ice. The perfect clarity and
flawless sparkle of the diamonds leached into my skin, claiming me,
marking me.
Only one way to get it off.
I thought I’d come to terms with my mortality. I thought I’d face the end
with my head held high and dry eyes—but that was before they told me the
method of my execution. When I thought of death, I pictured...nothing...I
had no image of how the end would come.
Now I did.
Only one way to get it off.
I was to be beheaded.
There’d be no sawing off the collar or picking the lock. The way the
clasp snapped so resolutely hinted at a one way mechanism. The heavy
noose was now mine...an accessory slowly strangling me by diamonds.
It wasn’t breakable. But I was. So fragile really, when a single sharp
blade could cast me from life into the nether. Diamonds were nature’s
hardest fortress—the quintessential marriage of unbreakable ice and power.
A new unwanted respect curdled in my stomach. Jethro said his mines.
Their mines. Diamonds were pure, but the method of collection had a
chequered history of death and violence.
They didn’t just play the part of untouchables. They were untouchable.
No!
My tugging fingers turned frantic. I arched my neck, searching with an
edge of insanity for a weakness in the soldered white gold and gemstones. It
had to come off.
It has to.
I didn’t have the strength to die. I didn’t have the martyrdom to let them
do this. Not for family. Not for fortune. Not for anything.
I’m weak. I don’t want to die!
Jethro grabbed my wrists, effortlessly pulling my arms away from my
throat. My eyes opened and all I saw was malevolent stone. There was no
compassion in his light-brown eyes. No sympathy or even guilt. How did he
have the power to be so close to me—to grow hard wanting me—and know
all along my fate?
Only a special person could do that. A person who wasn’t born of this
world, but brimstone and fire. From hell.
I struggled in his hold. The collar settled heavily, spreading its heinous
ice. “I was wrong about you.”
Jethro placed my hands by my sides, then let me go. He shrugged,
running a palm through his thick salt-and-pepper hair. “I’ve been nothing
but forthright and honest from the beginning. You’re the one who spun a lie
from the truth. You’re the one who ignored everything I was telling you.”
Turning to face the table, he wrapped a cold arm around my waist. “And
now it’s time to face the reality of everything you tried to ignore.”
Mr. Hawk, with his ridiculous tweed and leather outfit, stubbed out a
smouldering cigar. “Did you tell her?”
Jethro stiffened. “I forgot.”
His father reclined into the high-backed chair and folded his hands on
his stomach. “You were meant to tell her when you put it on. It’s called the
Weaver Wailer and it belonged to...”
A loud screeching sound exploded in my ears. My stomach rolled.
Vertigo spread its nullifying tentacles through my brain.
It’s the necklace. The one she wore when she came back the final time.
Jethro looked down, trying to capture my eyes, but I wouldn’t do it. I
couldn’t do it. I kept my vision blank, looking resolutely over his shoulder.
“I think you’ve already guessed who it belonged to.” Lowering his voice,
he whispered, “The last person to wear this collar was your mother. She
wore it for two years and twenty-three days before it was...forcibly
removed. It carries not only the diamonds of my bloodline, but also blood
from yours. We, of course, clean it thoroughly after every owner, but if you
look closely, I’m sure you’ll see the tarnish of their lives given in return for
their crimes.”
“Nila, when you’re a big girl, you can wear my clothes, shoes, and
jewellery, but you have to grow a little taller before that day.” My mother
laughed, looking down at me on the floor of her walk-in wardrobe. I’d not
only raided her jewellery box and draped myself in gemstones, but wore a
feather boa with a baggy one piece swimming suit and giant high heels. I
thought I looked incredible. For a seven-year-old.
Holding up the pearls around my neck, I said, “Promise? I can have
these when I’m your size?”
She ducked, pulling me into a hug. “You can have everything of mine.
Why?”
I smiled. I knew the answer to this. “Because you love me.”
She nodded. “Because I love you.”
The memory came and went, stealing the firm ground beneath my feet
and sending me headfirst into nausea. Spirals, loop de loops, and spincycles all churned my brain until I didn’t know up from down.
It wasn’t vertigo this time, but grief.
Crushing, crashing grief. A grief I hadn’t suffered, because all my
happy memories of her had been blocked by the wall of hatred. She was
supposed to be the bad guy for leaving my father. I’d been safe from
hurting. Safe from reliving everything with the knowledge of how precious
she was. How tragic her life became and for two years after she’d left. Two
years we didn’t try and save her.
The Hawks had stripped her from me and torn away any armour I had
against missing her. She wasn’t the bad guy. They were. They would all die
for this. They would rot for eternity. I would find a way.
Please, let me find a way.
I wore a necklace every firstborn woman in my family wore before they
were murdered—I was owed serious revenge. Disgusting, painful revenge.
A sob escaped my mouth. I couldn’t fight the spinning anymore and
doubled over. With a sickening splash, I threw up all over Jethro’s shiny
black shoes.
“Shit.” He jumped back, not that there was much mess. It’d been almost
twenty-four hours since I’d eaten—I had nothing to waste or purge. But the
dry heaves wouldn’t stop racking my frame.
“For fuck’s sake, Jet. Get her under control. We don’t have all day.” Mr.
Hawk’s voice shouted across the room.
Cold hands grabbed my shoulders, jerking me from bowed to straight. I
moaned as my head sloshed with pain.
“Stop embarrassing me,” Jethro snarled.
Embarrassing him? Bastard. Arsehole. Son of Satan. I glowered with
tear-swimming eyes into Jethro’s cold uncompassionate gaze. Something
flicked over his gold irises—a dark shadow. That was the only warning I
received before his hand came up and struck me around the side of the
head.
I thought I was brave. I thought I was strong. But I’d never been struck
before. Daniel’s slap in the car last night didn’t count. This abuse had come
from a black place—a place inside Jethro where unsurmountable anger
boiled. And it was endless. He may be a glacier on the outside, but in
there...in his heart...he steamed with pressuring rage.
Crashing to my knees, I curled my smarting head into my arms. I came
from a family who loved each other so much a disappointed look or stern
word was enough to break your heart. Physical abuse wasn’t something I
knew. It wasn’t something I could prepare for.
Jethro grabbed my hair, pulling me upright. I held onto his wrists to
prevent the tearing pain. My blurry gaze focused on his grey shirt and
perfectly creased jeans.
He glared. “You’ll clean that up, but for now you have other things to
attend to.”
Not letting go of my hair, he carted me toward his father. Every step I
took, I tried to hide my exposed breasts and ignore the breeze between my
naked legs. The pinafore Jethro had put on me barely covered my stomach
let alone valuable places. Places I would give my entire design line to have
covered. The stupid maid cap tilted to the side, clinging to my tangled hair.
I couldn’t count how many men existed around the table, but their eyes
never met mine. Most were glued to my chest or mesmerized lower down
as I side-shuffled to hide as much of my decency as possible.
But it wasn’t just their eyes sending spider legs scurrying over my flesh.
It was the huge immaculate paintings of men wearing white wigs, elegant
coat and tails, and hunting regalia glaring down from the dark red walls.
Their eyes weren’t lifeless but full of disdain—somehow they knew a
Weaver was in their midst and the crackling fireplace was useless to stop
my chill.
My sentence was to be carried out with ancestors and family heirlooms
as witnesses.
The moment we came to a stop beside Mr. Hawk, sitting in his ornate
dining chair, Jethro jerked my neck back. His flawless face filled my vision.
“You are no longer free. Look. See your future and understand there’s no
sweet talking, begging, or bargaining your way out of this. You wear the
collar. You’re ours completely.” Jethro’s voice was arctic, glittering with
power.
The collar cut into my skin. I wanted to spit in his face.
Shoving me toward Mr. Hawk, the old man snaked an arm around my
naked waist, tugging me onto his lap.
“Obey and make me proud, Ms. Weaver.” Jethro crossed his arms. He
shifted to stand behind his father’s chair, removing himself from the role of
authority, becoming merely a spectator.
He’s never called me Nila.
The stupid thought came and went on a heartbeat. Jethro was yet to use
my first name.
I shuddered, feeling overwhelmingly sick again.
Jethro was awful but being disowned and handed over to a room of men
was worse. I would’ve given anything to avoid was what about to happen. I
would willingly trade all my nights in a bed and return to the kennels. The
hounds were loving, kind...warm.
I sat frozen on Mr. Hawk’s lap.
His hand rested on my upper thigh, not violating but terrifying. “Now
that we all understand each other, I want you to look at something for me,
Nila. Then the festivities will begin. Every man you serve, you’ll receive
another snippet of your history. Only once you’ve completed your task will
you know the entire story and will be free to spend the afternoon either in
the steam baths below the house as a reward or in solitary confinement in
the dungeons as punishment, depending on how well you please us.”
I couldn’t understand how my body still functioned. Shock turned my
limbs to statues, fear made me mute—I died inside until there was no part
of me left. But still my heart kept pumping; my blood kept flowing—
staying alive only for their sick pleasure.
The weight of my mother’s collar bit into my neck and a question came
from no-where. My mother was a Weaver. Her mother before her was a
Weaver. But wouldn’t they have changed their names according to the
surname of their husbands?
I blinked, trying to remember my father’s last name.
I can’t.
“You look confused. I’ll permit you to ask a question before we
proceed,” Mr. Hawk said, settling me higher on his knee.
I fought my cringe, struggling to formulate the words. “My mother’s
maiden name was Weaver, but she would’ve changed it when she got
married.” I glanced at Jethro behind his father’s chair. He tilted his chin,
looking down his nose.
Mr. Hawk shook his head. “That son of mine hasn’t explained anything
has he.” Twisting in the seat, he glanced at Jethro. “What exactly have you
been doing? You know information is what grants us control. We’re the
ones in the right. How can she hope to accept her situation if you keep her
in the dark?”
Jethro clenched his jaw but remained silent.
Rolling his eyes, Mr. Hawk faced me again and smiled. “I’ll give you a
brief history lesson, then you must begin your duties.” Reaching up, he
tugged the maid’s cap on my head.
Every inch of me crawled, but I didn’t move away. I was hungry for
knowledge. Starving to know just how they continued to control my family
with no fear of police interference or retribution.
Mr. Hawk reclined, his thumb drawing small circles on my upper thigh.
“It all began with one man, who you’ll find out about in a little bit. He had
children, gracing them all with the Weaver name. Now, from that day on,
the power of the family name travelled with the firstborn girl. No matter if
she married, divorced, or suddenly wanted to change her name to something
whimsical, she wasn’t permitted. Whoever she married, it was a condition
that the man change his name so that their offspring always bore the Weaver
name and continued the line of succession of the debt.”
Why did they do it? Why keep a name that only brought misery? My
mind hurt trying to understand the Hawk’s power.
“You, I believe, are the seventh woman to be taken. And the claiming
can happen anywhere between the ages of eighteen and twenty-six.”
“You have rules on ruining someone’s life?”
His forehead furrowed. “What do you think we’re doing, Nila?
Everything we’re doing is following a strict set of rules—laid out in utmost
simplicity and must be followed.”
“If you’re following rules, then follow the rules of today’s society. You
think I accept what you’re telling me? That all of this is legal?” I spat the
last word. “You think its common place to threaten my family, steal me
away, and imprison me with a collar of diamonds that won’t come off until I
die? You’re completely insane. And wrong. And—”
“No one—especially a Weaver—has the right to speak to me like that.”
Mr. Hawk’s fingernails bit into my thigh. “What part are you not
understanding, girl? We haven’t threatened your family—they are under
observeillance to ensure their best behaviour. We didn’t steal you away—
you came voluntarily, remember? And as for the collar—you should be
proud to wear it. It’s the most treasured piece in the Hawks antiquities.”
I bit my lip as his fingernails pierced harder.
His voice dropped the scholarly softness, sliding into strictness. “I see
you need more concrete evidence. Fine. The diamonds you wear are worth
millions. The diamonds we’ve sourced have been used to trade, buy
services, bribe officials, own prime ministers, even control diplomats and
royalty. No one is above the allure of a flawless diamond, Ms. Weaver.
Everyone has a price. Lucky for us, we can afford any price.”
His tone sharpened. “Does that answer your rude question?”
What response could I give? There was nothing I could say or do to
ignore my entire situation. They might have some misplaced belief that they
were in the right—but that didn’t matter. Because they owned the very
people I would need to save me.
My shoulders dipped.
Mr. Hawk grinned. “Glad you’re coming to your senses. Don’t under
estimate us, Nila Weaver. We’ve had the law on our side for hundreds of
years. We still have the law on our side and that won’t change. You are
nothing more than a single woman who left the world’s spotlight because
she fell in love. You are already consumed and forgotten.”
His fingernails stopped slicing my leg; he patted me gently. “I apologise
that my son didn’t inform you of this. It’s his job to be implicitly open with
you. To ensure you accept your new standing quickly.” He threw a glare at
Jethro behind us.
Jethro locked his jaw, his eyes unreadable.
Mr. Hawk bounced me on his knee. “Now, no more questions. Serve my
Diamond brothers and earn your right to more information.”
My heart shot up my throat. “Serve them how?”
Mr. Hawk shook his head. “Ah, I just told you, no more questions. I
have no doubt Jethro would’ve been rather firm on that instruction. Silence
is the key to pleasing us.” He pinched my lips together. “Don’t say a word
until we permit it, and you’ll be rewarded.”
I’m to be a blow-up doll with no voice or soul?
Looking down, I fought against the urge to tear my face from his grip.
He didn’t let me go. And I couldn’t keep fighting the urge. So I did the
only thing I could. Slowly, I nodded, losing another battle against the
trickling tears cascading silently down my cheeks. They continued their
unhindered sad journey down my neck, through the collar, to my naked
nipples below.
The sun glinted through the window, blinding me for a second on the
diamond pin in Jethro’s shirt. His eyes were tight and narrowed, glaring at
the room of leather-jacketed men; his face resolute and frozen.
Freeing me, Mr. Hawk ordered, “Lean forward, and retrieve the first bit
of parchment.”
I sat unmoving. I didn’t want to wriggle on his lap. I didn’t want to give
any reason for things to grow or hands to grope.
Jethro lashed out from behind, catching me by surprise. He didn’t hit
me, but grabbed my diamond collar and snapped a leash to the back.
Tugging the restraint, he muttered, “Lesson one. You’ll do as your told the
second you’re told it. Otherwise, you’ll choke until you do.”
He moved to the back of the chair, leaving my line of sight. The
moment he was gone, the pressure on the collar increased, digging into my
larynx, cutting off my air supply.
Just let him strangle you.
It would be easier.
But as my body crushed against Mr. Hawk from the pressure, and the
natural instinct to fight took over, I knew I couldn’t be so weak. There was
no point in being stupid. If I was plane-wrecked in a jungle, I would obey
the law of the wild—doing absolutely anything to survive.
Wasn’t this the same thing?
I was in a den of beasts and they were trying to help me by teaching me
their law. If I obeyed, I would live. Entirely simple. Stupidly simple.
No sound, Nila. Not one word. Switch off. Retreat into that spot inside
and get through this.
I could do it by adapting, by learning. I refused to be hurt for
punishments I could avoid.
Jethro sensed my acquiescence at the same time as his father. I didn't
know what gave me away—the slouching of my shoulders, the soft puff of
sadness? Regardless, they knew I wouldn’t fight. They’d won.
Jethro released the pressure on my throat, removing the leash and
dangling it over the back of the chair as he moved back to his position. Mr.
Hawk angled my face, pressing a wet kiss on my cheek. “Good girl. You’re
learning.”
I didn’t even flinch. I was as cold as his son.
Embrace it.
Locking eyes with Jethro, I kept myself anchored while his father’s
hand slipped inside the stupid pinafore and found my breast.
Jethro gritted his teeth, but never stopped glaring into my blank gaze.
I tensed, willing every molecule to stay frigid and unattached. There
was freedom in drifting—as I’d learned in the kennel—and I let my mind
go.
I would be Jethro and remain stone cold on the outside. But inside I
would be Kite and cut the strings of my soul—soaring where they’d never
touch me.
No matter what they did.
My head bowed as Mr. Hawk pressed up, grinding a hard cock against
my naked arse. “Read the parchment.”
My hair fell in a thick black curtain, obscuring half of the men who
watched with eager eyes.
My hands didn’t shake as I reached for the parchment. I lowered my
eyes to read. I was silently amazed at how collected and aloof I seemed.
Shocked that I’d so easily turned off. What did that say about me? I’d just
learned about my mother. Spent the night with a pack of dogs. Am I really
that adaptable? Or was shock to blame?
The parchment used to be whole—it was age-stained, blood-marked,
and torn. Glancing upright, I noticed the remaining pieces scattered around
the table. A treasure hunt to read what would be my sentence.
Not every man had a piece, but at a quick count, I guessed four to five
shards of secret-tarnished paper were out there, waiting for me to read.
Looking back to the parchment in my hands, my eyes landed on the
crest I’d grown fast to recognise of hawks, women, and diamonds. It took
pride of place at the top of the letter with intricate calligraphy and
penmanship.
Taking a deep breath, I read.
On this date, the eighteenth day, of the eighth month, of the year of our
Lord fourteen-seventy-two, we hereby convene to settle the unsightly claims
and forthwith family disruptions between Percy Weaver and Bennett Hawk.
We call upon the royal sovereignty to grace this binding agreement
upon the two houses, to put aside flagitious slander, and immoral actions,
and settle this as gentlemen.
As esquire over this binding estate, I have mention Percy Weaver and
family, including church-sanctified marriage to Mary Weaver, and his thrice
offspring of two boys and one girl are also governed by the degree found
today, or they shall hang by the neck until dead for heinous crimes found
unjustifiable by the court of England so help me God.
It ended.
I stopped reading but didn’t move. Not a breath. Not a fidget. It was true
then. My family had done something to justify all of this.
But what could be so awful to earn a contract spanning generations of
repayments?
Mr. Hawk bounced me again, tweaking my nipple. “Finished?”
My heart neither fluttered nor sank. I was flying free—escaped from
this unfolding nightmare.
“Intrigued? Want to know the rest?” His fingers twisted harder, but I
didn’t care. All I cared about was finding out more.
Ignoring his touch, I breathed for the first time and nodded. As much as
I didn’t want to get close to the other men, curiosity burned. I was desperate
to read more torn pages and solve the mystery of my lineage.
Why did father never say anything? Why did he raise me to think we
were good people?
That question would probably never be answered.
Mr. Hawk placed his hands on my hips, hoisting me from his lap. I
stood with my eyes cast downward. Silent and waiting.
He smiled in encouragement. “Behaving well so far. Let’s see if you can
keep it up.” Waving toward the overladen sideboard full of hors d'oeuvres,
fish dishes, meat dishes, roast vegetables, and desserts, he said, “You’re our
waitress for this little get together. Please be so kind as to serve our meal.
You’ll receive a token of thanks from each of the Black Diamond brothers
and earn the right to finish your reading.”
My legs moved before my brain registered. The primal part of me
taking over to jump to the task. I might be a naïve woman who didn’t know
how to jerk a man off, but I was a businesswoman at heart. I’d been around
strict shop buyers, ditzy models, and sulking catalogue owners. I’d learned
how to adapt and sell my work.
This was no different.
I had to adapt and sell myself.
Make him care. Make him feel.
My eyes flew to Jethro. Was it possible? Could I break his ice and find a
man deep inside—a man who I could seduce, beguile, and ultimately use to
stay alive?
Am I that strong?
Mr. Hawk tapped my behind as I skirted the back of his chair. Jethro
didn’t move, granting a small space for me to pass.
I hunched into myself, preparing for whatever cruelty he had planned.
His body twitched. The perfect lines of muscle and masculinity once
again making me despise his natural beauty. An unwilling rush shot through
my system at the memory of him fingering me.
He’d wanted me in that moment and it had nothing to do with debts or
pain. It’d been pleasurable, confusing, and awkward but...maybe there was
something I could work with.
The idea to seduce Jethro flowered quickly. The bloom wasn’t fresh like
the bud of a rose but black. The unfurling petals dripped with filth,
sprouting from a place I never wanted to acknowledge. He belonged to a
family who ruined mine. He had no compassion. No heart.
How could I make him care when stone was utterly heartless?
I’ll try, though. I had nothing left to lose.
I could be their ward, to be tormented on a daily basis, for years. I
would be his toy for however long he wanted. Time could change anything
if the elements conspired with me. A mountain ultimately had to give way
to the sea if hammered by its salty waves.
I’ll be that wave.
Jethro cleared his throat, deliberately stepping forward. His large frame
pressed against mine, causing my body to twist and brush my naked breasts
against him.
“Oops,” he breathed.
I didn’t look into his eyes. I couldn’t stand to look at him. All of this
was his doing and I refused to let him unsettle me anymore. “Don’t touch
me,” I whisper-hissed.
His hand lashed out, slinking up my pinafore and tweaking the same
nipple his father had. “Silence.” He bowed his head to mine. “And you
loved me touching you. Stop being a little liar, Ms. Weaver.”
Gritting my teeth, I darted away, tearing his fingers from my breast. I
breathed hard when I reached the sideboard. So much food.
My stomach scrunched into a hunger ache.
So what I was naked? So what over twenty men waited to do who knew
what to me? It didn’t matter. Because my life hinged on throwing away
normal and embracing the crazy I now lived with.
I would meet them in hell and play their horrid games. I’ll come out the
victor.
Grabbing a tiered platter of pâté, crusty bread, and pickled vegetables,
my mouth watered.
I’m so hungry.
My stomach growled, sending spasms of pain. I’d never gone this long
without food, and the lack of sugars and vitamins faded the edges of my
vision. My fingers whispered over a piece of roasted potato. Just one little
taste...
“Hurry up,” Mr. Hawk ordered.
Shaking my head from the overwhelming need to shove a handful of
delicious looking food into my mouth, I turned to face the table. I’d never
waitressed before, but I guessed the man in charge would get first choice.
That means passing him again.
Holding tight to the platter, I held my head high, and made my way past
Jethro. His mouth twitched as he once again blocked my path. I kept my
lips tight together, not looking at the challenge in his eyes.
“Not interested in me anymore, Ms. Weaver?” he purred.
Mr. Hawk looked over his chair and pointed at me, then placed his
finger over his lips in the universal ‘hush’ sign. A non-so-subtle reminder
that I wasn’t permitted to speak.
When I didn’t respond. Jethro smiled. “I’m impressed.”
He might terrify me, but he needed to know I wouldn’t give up. I had
plans for him, and I wouldn’t be so easily cowed. Plus, he had my vomit on
his shoes, he shouldn’t be so smug.
I let myself glance into his golden eyes. You don’t scare me.
His capricious demeanour shifted slightly, a silent message glowing in
his gaze. Give me time.
He let me pass without another word.
Breathing shallowly, I came to a standstill beside Mr. Hawk. He nodded,
choosing a selection from the platter. “Good girl. You may now serve the
rest of the table. Left to right, if you please.”
Straightening, I forced myself to truly look at the men before me—the
gauntlet of masculinity I had to travel through to reach my destination.
My heart raced; a cold sweat broke out down my spine.
Stay cold. Stay free. And you’ll get through this.
I placed one foot, then another. My heartbeat ratcheted as I came to a
stop beside a large man. He had orange hair and a tattoo snaking up his
neck.
My vision wobbled; I tottered to the left as a small wave of vertigo
reminded me I’d been stable up to this point thanks to a miracle. Orange
Tattoo shot out an arm, preventing me from slamming into the table.
He grinned. “Steady, I won’t bite.” He brought me close, smiling so
deep a dimple formed. “I’ll lick though.”
Before I could move, his tongue landed on my thigh, licking long and
slow like a giant animal.
What?!
I squirmed, almost dropping the tray. His grip was absolute, holding me
firm until he’d tasted his full. The rush of vertigo turned to nausea. The
sickly scent of my previous sickness didn’t help my stomach from rolling
like a shipwreck.
Letting me go, I stumbled and tried to rub away the glisten of wetness
from his awful mouth. It only transferred to my naked elbow.
Orange Tattoo beamed, licked his lips, and took a selection of breads
and pickles. “Thank you, Ms. Weaver.”
I spun to face Mr. Hawk.
This couldn’t be true. He expected me to let this happen. From
everyone?
Mr. Hawk chewed thoughtfully, raising an eyebrow, daring me to speak.
My lips parted—to demand to know what happened. Was that the token
of gratitude he spoke of? A lick?
My chest puffed, sending a wash of embarrassment through me. Not
only was I naked but I had to permit them licking me!
Mr. Hawk pursed his lips, waiting for me to explode.
He’ll punish you. Don’t ask. Do. Not. Snap.
It took more courage and energy than I had. But I managed to suck in a
breath and release the stress swirling in my system. I had too many other
things to focus on to care about an unorthodox dinner soirée.
No speaking.
I had to pretend I had no tongue. Otherwise, waitressing would be the
least of my problems.
Glancing back at the men, they grinned, knowing I had no choice but to
continue.
Jethro’s voice ghosted behind me like a dark cloud. “You’re the main
course, Ms. Weaver. Each brother gets a taste—anywhere he chooses.
You’d be wise to allow it.”
My heart thundered. Anywhere?
But if it was just a lick—was that so bad? Perhaps this dinner party
might not be as awful as I’d feared. A lick I could tolerate. A touch I could
handle. Full penetration would drive my mind from its sanctuary straight to
an asylum.
It was as if Jethro knew that. Pushing me, little by little, past my
comfort zone.
I moved to the next leather-jacketed man. This one was skinny but had
an edge of violence. His shaved head shone as he helped himself to the food
before placing his finger in the top of my pinafore and pulling me down to
his level.
His tongue lashed out, tracing my cheekbone all the way to my ear.
Shuddering, I swallowed back my repulsion.
You can handle it.
The moment he’d finished, he said, “Thank you, Ms. Weaver.”
What did they want for me—permission that it was okay? That I was
grateful?
Standing upright, I struggled to move. Struggled to keep going when I
knew how many more licks I’d have to earn before it was over.
“Proceed, Ms. Weaver. Don’t disappoint me.” Jethro’s gravelly voice
invaded my ears. Damn him. Damn all of this.
Swallowing hard, I moved to the next.
He was handsome. Quite like Jethro in a stockier, less devilish kind of
way. He had dark hair with flecks of grey and a bird of prey tattooed on his
forearm.
Never taking his eyes from mine, he took a few items, then hooked a
strong arm around my waist and pushed up my maid’s uniform. His lips
pressed a kiss on my hipbone, the wet tease of a tongue hidden by the warm
pressure of his mouth.
Every inch of me revolted but I didn’t flinch.
Smirking, he let me go. “Thank you, Ms. Weaver.”
It was the smirk that gave him away.
He’s another Hawk.
The man nodded, sensing my connection to his pedigree. “I’m the
second brother,” he said softly. “I doubt you know my name seeing as
Jethro gets to have all the fun—but I’ll tell you—so you know who to
scream for when my older brother goes too far.” He crooked his finger,
hinting for me to move closer.
Despite myself, I bent. There was something about this brother.
Something different.
His light-brown eyes—a Hawk family trait it seemed—crinkled at the
corners. “I’m Kestrel.” Pointing at the tattoo on his arm, he added, “Like
the bird.”
“Leave her alone, Kes. Other brothers want a turn.” Jethro’s demand
snapped from behind.
Kestrel chuckled. “Easy there, Jet. Only playing with my food.” He sat
back, motioning me to continue.
How many sons did Mr. Hawk have? How many must I submit to when
Jethro had had enough of me? I didn’t have the mental protection to sleep
with an entire family of evilness.
My eyes didn’t linger on him and I wasn’t permitted to speak, but I
wanted to know more about him. I wanted to know why I had a sense of
kinship—no matter how slight.
Tense, I darted around his chair, moving to my next customer.
The next man had piercings in his eyebrow and lower lip. Blue-black
hair, so similar to Vaughn’s, tore my heart out as he bent his head over my
arm and dragged a pointed tongue toward my elbow.
V.
Tears threatened. V was everything to me. I couldn’t stand to think of
him while this happened. I should’ve messaged him back. I was cruel to
leave him in distress.
Closing my eyes, I put one foot in front of the other, moving toward the
next man.
And then the next.
And the next.
Each one thanked me once they’d tasted, acting like gentlemen rather
the lair of monsters they truly were.
With every lick, I froze, standing tense and hating while they dragged
their saliva all over my skin.
Thankfully, the lack of hunger tripped time, merging the men and
tongues into a merry-go-round of nightmares. I lost track of who licked
where, hiding myself away and focusing on the weight of my platter
growing lighter and lighter.
But not one person tasted my breasts or pussy.
It sent me into a state of uncomfortable awareness. They were men.
Taunting a woman who they’d been given permission to taste. Why hadn’t
they gone for the prized locations?
The unknowing and waiting sent my skin crawling more than their
eager tongues.
The next man I served was older with a greying moustache and wispy
hair. He licked my neck, nuzzling my hair before taking his fill of food.
I went to move, in a trance, to the next diner.
But the older man captured my hip and presented me with the next part
of the parchment.
My trance evaporated, leaving me hungry for information. This was
why I permitted this. I let myself be governed by history. The double
meaning of the thought didn’t escape me. You were taken because of
history. You’re staying because of history.
The diamonds of my collar bit into my neck in agreeance.
Placing the platter on the table, I removed myself from the twenty-first
century and proceeded to be swept to 1472.
For actions committed by Percy Weaver and his entourage of well-to-do
associates, he stands judged and wanting. His life is determined by the
grace of Bennett Hawk who states the following comeuppance:
Monetary compensation
Public apology
And most of all, bodily retribution
What a bastard. He couldn’t let some petty grievance go?
He did save the entire family from hanging. Somehow, he’d kept Percy
Weaver and my ancestors from swinging on a rope, and in a way, I had to
be grateful. Grateful to a man who’d saved my bloodline but stolen my
future at the same time.
If this document had never been agreed upon, I would never have been
born. No one past Percy and Mary would’ve existed. It was hard to hate
someone who’d granted life, but easy to hate them for stealing countless of
those lives generations later.
“Keep going, Ms. Weaver,” Jethro purred.
My head snapped up.
He stood there, wrapped in his horrible silence.
I wanted to glower. I wanted to do something idiotic and stick my
tongue out at him. But there was no point making him hate me more than he
already did. The moment I could charge my phone, I would Google every
enticing come-hithers a woman could make.
I’ll seduce him.
I’d enjoyed seeing his impeccable control snap by the stables. I loved
that I was the one to do it.
I’ll make him care.
I would turn this travesty into a prophecy by weaving my Weaver magic
over a Hawk.
With strength building in my heart, I grabbed my tray.
Moving forward on unsteady knees, I looked greedily at the next piece
of paper. It sat coyly in the centre of the table, beckoning.
The next man to taste me was a young boy, barely out of his teens. His
touch was gentle, tongue barely licking. He was my favourite from the
table.
After another two licks, I hoped I deserved the next scrap of parchment,
but no one gave it to me. My heart sank as I completed a full rotation,
squeezing my eyes as each tongue inched closer to the places I wished were
covered.
I couldn’t stop shivering when I placed the empty platter on the
sideboard. Resting my palms on the hard surface, I breathed deep. Tears
pressed on the back of my eyes, disgust rolled in my stomach growling with
desperate hunger. This was torture on so many levels. Delivering food to
well-fed men all the while they feasted on me, too.
“The main course, if you will, Nila,” Mr. Hawk muttered.
I looked over my shoulder. He sat there, running his fingers through his
goatee. His golden eyes, so like Jethro’s, held no patience or tolerance but
his lips tilted in mirth. He was enjoying this.
Of course he was. They all were.
Including my main tormentor.
Pushing off from the sideboard, I collected a large silver tray of chicken
and asparagus. Keeping my eyes down, I deliberately kept the tray high and
outstretched, giving me a shield in which to pass Jethro.
Not that it helped.
His arm shot out, stopping me. I cursed the familiarity of his touch.
Screamed at the horrible way my body remembered the pleasure he’d
granted by the stables. I wanted nothing from him. Especially the memory
of his fingers.
I glared into his eyes. Stay silent.
It was hard.
I had so much I wanted to say. So much to yell. The side of my head
still throbbed from his strike; my ego still hurt from not knowing how to
jerk him off the way he desired. He made me feel like a rejected little girl.
Bowing close, he whispered in my ear, “I’m enjoying watching you be
so obedient, Ms. Weaver. And your silence...” He brushed my hair away
from my cheek, fingertips lingering on my neck. “...is making me hard.”
I sucked in a gasp, looking to the front of his trousers despite myself.
The outline of his massive cock that terrified me—more than his hands,
temper, or god-awful silence—stood firm and bulging against his jeans.
He smiled. “Keep up the good work and you might get two rewards this
evening.” His eyes darkened. “Because we both know you want me to
finish what I started.”
My gasp turned to a growl. I couldn’t fathom how my stomach swooped
even while sickness swirled. Damn my traitorous body for finding his evil
beauty attractive.
Are you sure you want to seduce him just for protection? I hated the
question. I hated that I didn’t have an answer.
Jerking away from him, I stalked toward my starting position. Standing
beside Mr. Hawk, I served him first. The moment he’d taken a few morsels,
I moved to leave, but he pinched my pinafore, keeping me still.
His eyes met mine and I knew, just knew, this serving round wouldn’t
be my arms, neck, or hips up for a taste. This would be worse. Much worse.
“Face me, girl,” he ordered.
My teeth chattered, but I slowly did as he requested.
“Lean down.”
Closing my eyes, I obeyed.
His hot breath clouded over my chest before a wet, warm mouth latched
onto my nipple. A graze of teeth, a swipe of a tongue—it all drove me to
the pinnacle. The pinnacle where I knew I would burn in hell for not only
permitting it, but for the tiny flutter of need that had burst into life while his
son drove his finger inside me.
My head pounded as I shoved the betrayal away. I was the one who
betrayed myself. I was the one not strong enough to fight Jethro. He’d won
the moment I saw him and let my need for touch consume me.
Tears tickled my spine and the moment Mr. Hawk pulled way, I ran.
I didn’t get far.
Orange Tattoo, who sat next to Mr. Hawk caught me, holding me tight.
“Now, now. You’re doing so well. Don’t ruin it.” His large hand splayed on
my shoulder blades, jerking me to his sitting level. With a tight smile, his
mouth latched onto my other nipple.
I whimpered as his large soppy lips sucked. He took his time, swirling
his tongue around the hard bud, before letting go in a loud slurp.
I stood shaking as he selected some chicken and sent me on my way.
I can’t do this.
Self-pity filled my empty stomach, and I stood frozen to the thick
burgundy carpet.
“Move, Ms. Weaver,” Jethro murmured.
My body swayed to obey but everything inside rebelled. I didn’t care
Mr. Hawk had eloquently described my cage with the use of diamonds and
debts. I didn’t care that I had no choice but to do as I was told.
I just couldn’t do it.
My eyes flew wide as Jethro’s hands landed on my shoulders. He spun
me to face him, breathing hard. “Do. It. Now.” The force of his command
buckled my knees. I dropped my head.
Silently, Jethro stormed me forward, presenting me to the next man. The
platter wobbled in my hands but I stood upright while a vile mouth suckled
on my breast.
Once it was over, Jethro manhandled me to the next, whispering in my
ear, “Make me come back and show you how to behave, and I won’t be
nice. You still cling to the ideology that you’re better than us. That any
moment this will be over.” His teeth nipped at my ear. “That’s torture
because it’s false. It won’t happen. Accept it and be done with the past.
Accept it and embrace everything we’re giving you.”
Shoving me forward, he patted my backside. “I can be nice if you give
me reason to be, Ms. Weaver. Try me by behaving for the rest of the
luncheon.”
I didn’t watch as he left, resuming his standing position behind his
father’s chair.
I can be nice.
Bullshit he could be nice. But the sooner I obeyed, the sooner it was
over.
So...I obeyed.
Mouths.
Fingers.
Tongues and teeth.
They all tasted. They all groped.
I thought the first course was hard. I’d clung to the morals of how
wrong it was for so many men to treat one woman so unfairly.
This course did things to me I wished I could deny. Fat lips, thin lips,
hot mouths, cool mouths. They all not only took from me but gave
something in return.
A horrible realisation that my body was taking over.
My horror sank like a rock every time a man had a new taste. Slowly
my stomach fluttered; my insides rebelling against the melting that
occurred.
The men didn’t care countless mouths had been on my skin. They took
turns between my left and right nipples, nibbling, sucking. I wished they’d
bite. I willed them to hurt me—something to prove how vile they were.
But each one—old, young, trim, overweight—they all loved me. They
adoringly suckled. They moaned with such deep appreciation, I struggled to
remember this was by force not by choice. I felt as if I granted them a gift.
A gift they truly appreciated.
Don’t. Don’t buy into the mindfuckery.
Even my inner voice turned slightly breathless, a lot confused, and
edging toward acceptance.
I grew lightheaded as I trudged from man to man. I didn’t make eye
contact with any of them. I became listless. Numb. Apart from a tiny spark
tugging on the invisible cord from my nipples to my core. I wished it wasn’t
so. I craved to remain unaffected.
But slowly they turned me from intellectual businesswoman to
trembling plaything.
Slowly, I grew wet.
Sharp teeth dragged my attention through the blackness that’d become
my soul, back to reality.
I looked into the eyes of Daniel.
The mellow trance I’d been lulled into snapped like a rubber band. I no
longer found any acceptance or lusty appeal, only hollow rage.
“It’s not much fun licking a woman when she isn’t paying attention,” he
sneered.
My heartbeat flew terrorised around my chest. My nipple throbbed from
where he’d bitten me.
Licking his lips, he added, “You taste good, Weaver, but I’m looking
forward to the next course.”
My heart promptly shot itself and splattered against the floor.
The next course.
No. No. No. No.
“Here. You earned this.” Shoving another piece of parchment my way, I
forced back my tears.
Moving awkwardly, I placed the empty tray on the sideboard, then
returned to Daniel’s side. My skin broke out in goosebumps being so close,
but he dangled the parchment like a present I desperately wanted.
Taking it, I couldn’t hide my shakes this time. My aloofness and spirit
were gone, replaced by a brittle shaking leaf.
A leaf that was turned on and damp.
Upon reflection of his crimes, Percy Weaver hereby submits to this
esquire’s ruling and moves to action the latest degree formulated in this
very chamber by Bennett Hawk. The death warrant upon the heads of the
Weaver House will be eradicated and burned upon signature of this newly
drafted document. Terms forthcoming...
That was it?
Tears spurted from my eyes. I’d let countless men suck on my breasts
for no more than a tease?
How could they?
How could I?
How could I allow my body to react to their foul ministrations? I hated
myself. I hated that I couldn’t hide my weakness or the stupid hormones I’d
spent my whole life ignoring.
My knees wobbled and I almost folded like an accordion to the floor.
“You pass out and you won’t like what you find when you awake.”
Jethro’s voice cut through my grief.
Anger battled away my tears, nursing a new warmth inside. A warmth
born of rage rather than flimsy passion. This burned hotter; it licked with
orange flames, abolishing my hunger and weakness.
I was fed by anger. I smouldered with hate. I became stronger because
of it. It gave me power to continue, but also stole my safety of acceptance. I
hissed and scalded with liveliness. I couldn’t switch off.
“The next course, Ms. Weaver,” Jethro commanded from his position at
the head of the table. Balling my hands, I threw away the parchment and
stalked to the sideboard.
Dessert.
I knew what would happen.
I can’t do this.
You will do this.
In my rage, I made a reckless decision. I was at war with my body—
why not step over the battle line and join them? Why not embrace it? It was
yet another tool—another lesson. If I embraced the new feelings inside, I
would be better equipped at chipping away at Jethro’s cold exoskeleton of
ice and burrowing my way into his warmth.
I would make him care.
I would pleasure him.
Then I would kill him.
My legs scissored together. Everything inside curled deeper into hiding.
The moment I went near the table, I would lose all control. I didn’t trust my
body. It overpowered me every time. And it sucked to be in this mess with a
traitor.
Get it over and done with.
Taking a deep breath, I collected my last course.
Passing Jethro with a gilded tray of mini éclairs, bon bons, and trifles, I
kept my eyes down. He’d torment me, no doubt.
Sure enough, his arm wrapped around my shoulders, forcing me to face
him. His breathing was slightly uneven; his voice lost a tiny shred of
chilliness. “Get through this, and I’ll reward you. I’ll be kind, because you
deserve it.” Pressing a possessive kiss on my cheek, he whispered, “I’ll
wipe it all away.”
I was struck dumb by the rare and scarily beautiful glimpse at a man I
didn’t know existed. But then I blinked as Jethro's ice slid back into place, a
grim smirk on his lips. “My offer only stands as long as you don’t speak,
act out, or disappoint me.”
Unwinding his arm, he shoved me toward his father.
Almost drunkenly, I moved toward Mr. Hawk. My stomach quivered
with trepidation; my heart was prey running frantically for its life.
Mr. Hawk smiled, holding up another piece of paper. “Here. Your last
one until you’ve completed this final service. I think you deserve it, don’t
you?” His eyes raked down the front of my ridiculous maid’s uniform. The
cap had stayed in place—how, I didn’t know.
Patting my arse, he added, “I must admit you refrained beautifully, even
your mother who was my favourite, didn’t do so elegantly at her first dinner
party.”
I ignored that, latching onto the parchment.
Mr. Hawk motioned me to put the tray on the table, before handing over
the small piece.
Percy Weaver and family hereby acknowledge his agreeance to the one
and only term set forth by Bennett Hawk. In accordance with the law, both
parties have agreed that the paperwork is binding, unbreakable, and
incontestable from now and forever. Details and parties of both signatures
are displayed on the enclosed verified document, henceforth known as the
Debt Inheritance.
My eyes met his.
If only I had the rest. I would scream and give up the charade of
obedience. I was done. I would take pain to avoid what was about to
happen. I would take pain rather than pleasure because then I would still
know myself. The longer this went on, the less in-tune I was with the girl
I’d been.
Too many feelings. Too many sensors. Too many rabbit-holes with too
many right and wrongs.
You’re giving up so soon? They killed your mother! They’ve broken your
father’s heart. Could I not stomach some unpleasantness and confusion in
order to find a way to repay them?
Disappointment weighed my heart. I thought I’d have more endurance.
No. I won’t give in.
This is nothing. Be that kite. Cut your strings again.
Bracing my shoulders, I moved closer to Mr. Hawk without being
asked.
His eyes widened, then a grin spread his lips. “Good girl, indeed.”
Bowing his head, his arm wrapped around my waist, tilting me back a little.
“You’re proving to be a testament to my son’s training.”
My waist height was almost perfect for a lowered mouth to latch onto
the front part of my sex.
And that was when I felt the strangest, wettest, alluring, disgusting thing
of my life.
His tongue slid along my clit, wriggling softly, drenching me in saliva.
My stomach clenched, my hands balled, and I wobbled in his arms.
The disgusting element didn’t leave. I waited for my body to betray me,
to like it, but all I felt was grotesque impatience for it to be over.
And then...it was.
My first experience with a tongue down below, and it’d been done by a
man older than my father. If I didn’t have an empty stomach, I would’ve
thrown up all over again. There was nothing sexy or erotic about that.
Tapping my behind, he murmured, “Proceed.”
Swallowing hard, I collected the dessert tray and crossed the small
distance to Orange Tattoo. He crooked his finger, beckoning me closer.
Locking my jaw, I held the desserts high and did as he requested. His
orange hair tickled my thighs as he leaned down, running his tongue over
the private bundle of nerves.
Luckily for me, I wasn’t sensitive, nor did I enjoy it.
Once he’d taken his trifle and tasted his fill, I left to serve the next.
And the next.
And the next.
Some men forced my legs to spread, angling their faces deep. Some
men barely touched me, their hot breath wafting between my thighs.
I would like to say I managed to turn my brain off—to do what I
promised and fly free, but every tongue kept me locked in the world I lived
in. Every lick made my body turn to stone while my tummy twisted and
ached from clenching.
I delivered dessert, but I was the ultimate sweet. The men took their
time, firm fingers holding my hips, dragging their foul tongues. And after
every violation, they’d wipe their glistening mouths and say, “Thank you,
Ms. Weaver.”
Thank you.
As if their appreciation was enough to stop me from feeling like dirt.
Their treatment never changed. They remained courteous and gentle.
Obeying boundaries and not doing anything but licking me in a place they
had no right.
Their pleasantness made all of this seem so normal. So terribly normal.
And my hatred slowly switched back to acceptance. The small flutter I’d
felt from my nipples being sucked returned—frightful, tentative, but
softening my hate tongue by tongue.
They weren’t hurting me. They weren’t making me do anything that had
the potential to shatter my mind.
They just tasted.
A little taste.
That’s all.
And I didn’t fight.
Not at all.
I’m wet.
By the time I came to Daniel, my legs were drenched and the trimmed
hair I meticulously maintained was mattered with droplets of Diamond
brotherhood.
My hands were balled around the tray; my jaw tight and aching.
Because no matter my good intentions—they’d won. They’d caused my
body to have a reaction, and I was soaking.
The strange ache that Jethro had conjured was back, pulsing deep in my
core. The flicker of tongues and gentle tastes frustrated me and I hated,
positively hated, that I had to fight my hips from pressing harder against
them.
I’d begun the service uptight but now I was wound tight. Seeking
something. Seeking relief.
Daniel pushed his chair back, angling me physically between his spread
hips. With a malicious glint in his eyes, he pushed me back with a firm
palm between my breasts. “Fuck the stupid rule.”
I gasped as his mouth latched around my clit. The suction of his mouth
made my body twist with oversensitivity. He wasn’t playful or respectful
like the rest of the men. He knew what he wanted and he took.
Hard.
The ache wound tighter and tighter, clawing its way toward relief.
I squeezed my eyes. I couldn’t look at the men watching. I couldn’t do
anything but breathe and get through it. And I definitely couldn’t look up
where a small growl came, masked with silence.
It was nothing more than a growl.
But it resonated in my bones with knowledge.
Jethro.
The few seconds that each man had taken seemed much longer in
Daniel’s arms. Suddenly, I cried out, jerking hard.
The tip of his tongue probed my entrance, trying to enter me.
No one had done that. They’d behaved with some unspoken rule to taste
but not devour.
Fuck the stupid rule.
Daniel’s voice repeated in my head. Had there been guidelines on how I
was to be treated?
Everything we’re doing is following a strict set of rules—laid out in
utmost simplicity and must be followed.
I recalled what Mr. Hawk had said.
He had rules meant to ruin me but also...protect me?
Daniel tried again, his fingers biting into me painfully.
Then, I was wrenched away.
Torn free of his grip with a slice of his fingernails and dragged to the
end of the table. The empty dessert tray went flying, clanging against the
floor.
My legs tripped, sending me colliding with a body I’d been so intimate
with only hours before.
The crash of the tray cut through the room like a loud cymbal. But no
one said a word.
The moment Jethro dragged me to the head of the table opposite Mr.
Hawk, he shoved the largest of all parchments into my hands. His eyes were
dark, face tight. “Here, read it.”
Breathing fast, trying hard to forget about the sticky saliva between my
legs and the sensation of having his brother’s tongue trying to enter me, I
took the tattered age-stained scroll.
Jethro scowled, keeping a small distance between us. His coldness
buffeted me, sending ice scattering over my bare arms. He looked pissed off
—furious, yet there was something there that made my stomach twist.
Whatever game we’d played, whatever war we’d started back at the
stables, wasn’t finished. He knew it. I knew it. And the knowledge sent
power thrilling through my veins.
Leaning close, he hissed, “Stop staring at me, Ms. Weaver. I gave you a
request.” Tapping the scroll in my palm, he snapped, “Read. It.”
Tearing my eyes from his, I obeyed.
The intricate border caught my attention first. Along with a design of
vines and filigree, the words bound, indebted, owned were entwined in red
ink.
The calligraphy of ancestors past sentenced me to a life worse than
death. My rights had been taken. My life stolen. My body no longer mine.
18th August 1472
Signed and witness by Esq John Law
Matter between Weaver versus Hawk
Known forthwith as the Debt Inheritance
This hereby concludes all debate and conversation and puts forth a
binding debt. Council has been provided along with sovereign approval for
such an agreement.
As set in this chamber, I have witnessed the signatures of both parties of
House Weaver and House Hawk, along with their significant entourage and
companions.
The debt states as follows.
Percy Weaver hereby solemnly swears to present his firstborn girl-child,
Sonya Weaver, to the firstborn son of Bennett Hawk, known as William
Hawk. This will nullify all unrest and unpleasantries until such a time as a
new generation comes to pass.
This debt will not only bind the current occupancies of the year of our
Lord 1472 but every year thereafter. Every firstborn Weaver girl will be
gifted as fair comeuppance to the firstborn Hawk boy to be claimed
between the years of one and eight and six and twenty respectively. Both
parties will be forever agreed on this day set forth.
The life and all attributes will be determined by the current Hawk, no
rules or precedence will be set, and this agreement raises them above the
law, operating within the grace of the royal decree.
Signed:
Bennett Hawk & Family.
Percy Weaver and Family.
Jethro.
I KNEW WHEN she’d read it.
I knew when the final sentence sank in.
We had a document signed, sealed, and delivered by the royal
magistrate of England giving us carte blanche to do as we liked. There was
nothing illegal about my actions. There was nothing anyone could find me
guilty of.
It was the ultimate approval.
Not to mention, we had wealth to ensure no one would contest it. There
was nothing to fight against. The sooner she accepted that, the easier this
would be.
Nila’s eyes bugged wide, looking up from the parchment.
Grabbing her shoulders, I backed her against the table. The horror living
in her black gaze was enough to drag a tiny bit of humanness from my cold
soul.
Watching her being tasted—I wouldn’t deny—it fucked me off. She was
my plaything. Mine to torment.
I was pissed at my father for permitting the entire brotherhood to use
her. They weren’t deserving of drinking someone’s misery. That right was a
Hawk’s and only a fucking Hawk’s. Excluding my younger cock of a
brother.
He deserved shit.
Grinding my teeth, I placed my palm against her sternum, pressing her
breakable chest. Her heart beat like a war drum beneath my fingers.
Her lips parted, but she didn’t fight as I pushed her backward.
I didn’t say a word—controlling her by sheer anger and will.
Her defined stomach muscles clenched as she gave in, sprawling
backward onto the table. A small sound of pain came from her lips,
catching her weight on her elbows.
She refused to lie down.
She would.
My cock fucking bruised itself, punching my belt time and time again.
Only I knew how she tasted when she wanted to be tasted. Only I knew
how she sounded when she wanted it so fucking bad. And only I knew how
tight she was.
That tightness belonged to me.
I doubted I’d fit. I doubted I’d get half my dick inside her, but until I’d
had the pleasure of trying, no one else was permitted near her. I had the
scroll giving me power over everyone on that subject—including my father.
I swallowed hard. The anger watching my brother stick his fucking
tongue inside her boiled. I teetered on a dangerous edge.
Pull back.
I couldn’t.
I wanted what I wanted, and I’d take what was owed to me.
“You finally understand.” My voice was thicker, deeper, overrun with
the dark lust that’d been created this morning. She’d done this to me. It was
her curse to fix me.
I couldn’t look at her without feeling her thrust against my finger. I
couldn’t see past the challenge. The building strength in her skinny frame.
She was learning.
I was learning.
We were learning how to play this game together.
She shivered as I dragged my hand down her front, moving lower and
lower. My cock ached for the wet temptation belonging to me. I was
responsible for her.
She’d been through a lot. She’d obeyed even though she’d fought.
She’d kept it together but now she was precariously close to losing it. I
wasn’t so heartless to ignore that craving in her eyes. The borderline
insanity of needing a release. Combined with finally seeing proof that we
were the good guys? Well, I owed her.
Just a little.
It was my job to take her to the edge, dangle her for a time, but then
draw her back into safety. My purpose was to bridle everything she was, so
she would do anything I asked.
Glaring into her eyes, I said, “You are mine. I am not your master or
owner or boss. I am the man who controls your entire existence until you
pay off your family’s debts. You don’t breathe unless I permit it. You don’t
move unless I request it. You live a simple life now. One with a single word
you need remember...yes.”
My touch skated from her belly to her hips.
She stiffened to a plank. Her gaze left mine, locking on the ornate
ceiling.
“Look at me.” My voice turned harsh, barbaric beneath its cultured
refinement. “Has it sunk in yet? That I can do anything I want to you?”
She didn’t respond—just like she’d been told not to. Silence. Blissful,
blessed silence. She couldn’t admonish or argue. She was pliant.
Wondrously pliant.
She deserves a reward.
I tried to hold back.
I didn’t want an audience.
But fuck it.
Shoving her higher on the table, I slapped away her position on her
elbows, crashing her spine onto the wood. She cried out, then sucked in a
harsh breath.
I grabbed her legs, forcing them wide.
Her pink flesh invited me, glistening, not from other men’s tongues, but
arousal. Arousal for me. Arousal that I intended to take advantage of.
Grabbing an untouched glass of water from a Diamond brother, I
dumped the liquid all over Nila’s pussy.
She cried out; legs trying to scissor. But I didn’t let her move.
The water trickled through her dark hair, pooling beneath her. It wasn’t
enough, but it washed at least some of the men’s spit away.
I only wanted to taste her.
Hooking my hands beneath her hips, I held her tight.
“No. Don’t—”
Too fucking late.
With a fleeting smile, I captured her swollen cunt in my mouth.
The moment my tongue shot out, pressing firm and hard, she arched off
the table.
“Ah!” Her mouth hung wide, her neck straining as every muscle shot
into stark relief. Her black hair fanned out on the table, sliding against her
shoulders as she writhed on the wood.
Snapping my fingers, I glared at two Diamond brothers. They leapt to
attention, grabbing her wrists and holding her down.
She squirmed. She fought. But my fingers only bit harder into her arse,
keeping her pinned wide and open.
My fucking brother didn’t have the right to tongue-fuck her.
But I did.
I hadn’t planned on giving her such a reward, but...it wasn’t just her
getting off on this.
The power. The submission. Her taste. Her damn fucking taste.
I showed too much. I let go of my tight restraint and drank.
She groaned as I shifted a hand, holding her hipbones hard on the table.
Then she whimpered. My tongue became my weapon of choice as I licked
downward. No hesitation. No teasing.
I was there for one goal.
Her goal.
My eyes rolled back as I plunged my tongue inside her tight hot
warmth.
Fuck me.
“God!” Her hips tried to run from my invasion. Her mouth opened
wide; her ribcage visible as her lungs strained to breathe.
I set a pace no one would be able to ignore.
I fucked her. There was no other word for how I drove my tongue in and
out, fast and possessive. The muscles in her belly clenched. She panted, she
moaned, then she screamed.
She gave up the fight, giving into me.
A spasm of pre-cum dampened my jeans as her hips shot upward, her
clit brushing against my nose.
Her body twisted, trying to get her hands free, but the brothers wouldn’t
let her go.
She turned wild. Seeking. Demanding. The same sexual creature from
the stables.
I couldn’t breathe without dragging her scent into my lungs. I couldn’t
swallow without drinking her. And I couldn’t fucking think without wanting
to tear off my jeans and plunge deep inside her.
My tongue worked faster, the tips of my teeth gracing her pussy as I
drove deeper than I’d ever gone before.
I ate her. I fucked her. I owned her.
Her tight pussy squeezed my tongue, begging for more.
I’ll give you more.
I’d given her too much already.
Fuck.
Her legs suddenly latched around my ears, grinding herself onto my
face.
She moaned hard; a breathless beg on her lips. I couldn’t stop myself.
My tongue drove harder; my head bobbed faster.
She unravelled.
She combusted.
She screamed as she came on my tongue.
Nila.
OH, MY GOD.
Oh, my God.
It didn’t. It couldn’t. He didn’t. I couldn’t.
What the hell did I just do?
Jethro stood straight, breathing hard. His eyes were tight; his mouth
drenched and red.
My cheeks flamed, heart racing like I’d run ten kilometres.
What was that?
What magic did he possess that made me throw away selfconsciousness, decorum, and hatred? How could I squirm that way? Sound
that way? Come that way?
I came.
He made me come.
My captor shot me free for one blissful second, granting me something
no one else had. The sparks and waves and mind-twisting delicious
clenching. I wanted more. I wanted it now.
Jethro wiped his mouth, trying unsuccessfully to hide the lust glowing
in his eyes. He’d given, not taken. He’d done what he said.
I’ll wipe it all away.
The only thing I could focus on was him. The room of men didn’t
matter. Their tongues and touches and pleasantly whispered thank yous
were gone. Burned to a crisp thanks to the nuclear explosion he’d set off. I
was no longer at the mercy of the room. I owned the room.
Then everything came crashing back.
My first orgasm was given by a man whose father killed my mother.
My privacy had been completely stripped by the man who’d stolen me
from my family.
He’d made me sleep with dogs.
He played with my head.
He didn’t give a damn about me.
Why was he so clever? So perfectly designed for this game?
I struggled to sit up. The two men holding my wrists let me go, and I
shot into a sitting position, wrapping arms around my torso.
The hot sparkly burst that made everything so inconsequential faded
with every rapid heartbeat. It was like being in the eye of the storm. Jethro
granted me silence. He’d shared his heavenly silence and quieted my mind
from everything I was feeling.
But now the storm gathered strength, howling, twisting, sucking me
back up the funnel of horrors.
Eyes.
So many eyes upon me. Paintings and real. Men who’d seen me naked.
Men who’d licked every inch. Men who didn’t care if I lived or died.
You let him control you.
You let your body rule your mind.
You let yourself down.
Crushing grief swamped me. I couldn’t be there another moment. I
couldn’t sit there with residual sparks shivering in my core. I couldn’t
pretend that everything was acceptable.
Jethro smirked, his breathing calmed as he dragged large hands through
his hair. My heart broke into shards. How could he give me something so
incredible all while hating me? His mercurial moods, his unreadable face—
it confused me. Even worse, it upset me.
Visceral repulsion and horror howled through me as the storm grew in
strength. The compliant prisoner disappeared under a tsunami of rage. This
wasn’t okay. None of this was okay.
This is not okay!
Balling my hands, I scooted off the table. Keeping my distance from
Jethro, I bared my teeth at him—the first male to drive me up a mountain
I’d never leapt off before.
Him.
He’d had no right to make me come. To give me a gift not out of
kindness but control. He’d proven a valuable lesson. He could make me do
anything he wanted, and there was nothing I could do about it.
His eyebrow quirked; chin tilted with arrogance. He didn’t say a word,
moving to lean against the door with his hands jammed in his pockets. He
gave nothing away. No hint at how he felt watching other men use me. No
clue as to what he was thinking when he made me come.
I was his to repay this horrible ludicrous debt. But he didn’t seem to
care.
And that was what broke my heart.
He didn’t give an arse about what happened to me. Everything I’d
hoped—the secret plan to make him care—was smashed to dust. There was
no pleasing a rock like him. No appealing to his compassion.
He has none.
Tearing my eyes from his, I glowered at the table. Standing tall, I
embraced my nakedness.  I throbbed with righteousness. I trembled with
indecency.
I hated what I wore. It covered nothing and was theirs. I wanted nothing
to do with them. I wanted to refuse their food, spit out their water, and burn
their clothes. Not that they’d offered me any.
With suddenly steady hands, I tore the French maid’s cap off my head. I
threw it down the table. The satin wood let it slide all the way to the centre
where it rested like a stain, a sin—a simple innocuous thing screaming of
wrongness.
The men didn’t move.
Fumbling at the ties around my neck, I pulled the hated pinafore over
my head and balled it up. Standing proud, naked—showing off my bruises
from vertigo and tongue smears from bastards—I spoke. “Look at you.
Look at how masculine and powerful you are.” Pointing my finger around
the table, I growled, “Look at how scary and dominating and strong you
are. Look at how proud you must be. You proved you’re invincible by
taking advantage of a woman brought here against her will. You used a girl
who has to live her worst nightmares to protect those she loves.”
Stabbing myself in the chest, I whispered, “Wait...I got it wrong. You’re
not the strong ones. I am. You’re weak and disgusting. By doing what you
did, you gave me more power than I’ve ever had before. You gave me a
new skill—a skill at ignoring you because you’re nothing. Nothing.
Nothing!”
“And you!” I swung my arm, gaze zeroing in on Jethro. The one man
who held my life in the palm of his hand. He was nothing. Just like his
brethren of bastards.
Jethro stood taller, a shadow darkening his face. His hands came out of
his pockets, crossing in front of his large chest.
“You...” I seethed. “You think you’re the baddest one here. You think
I’ll cower. You think I’ll obey.” Running both hands through my hair, I
shouted, “I’ll never cower. I’ll never obey. You’ll never break me, because
you can’t touch me.”
Spanning my arms, I presented my naked form as a gift—the gift he’d
hinted at wanting but hadn’t taken. “I’ll never be yours even though you
own my life. I’ll never bow to you because my knees don’t recognise your
so-called power. So do your worst. Hurt me. Rape me. Kill me. But you’ll
never ever own me.”
Breathing hard, I waited.
The room had remained silent. But now it filled with rustling of leather
as men shifted in their seats. The atmosphere went from shocked silence to
heavy anticipation.
My overworked heart kicked into another gear, sending my vision a
little grey, a little fuzzy. Please, not now.
Planting my legs, gripping the soft carpet beneath my toes, I locked my
knees against a wave of vertigo.
Mr. Hawk was the first to move. He placed his elbows on the table,
linking his fingers together. “I was wrong. You’re nothing like your mother.
She had a brain. She was smart.” His voice dropped the chivalrous country
man edge, deepening into violent snaps, “You, on the other hand, are wilful
and stupid. You don’t see that we are your family now. The moment you
slept under my roof you became a Hawk by means of acquisition.”
I laughed. “I’m still a Weaver then because I didn’t sleep under your
roof.” My kitten claws sharpened. I’d never been a fighter, but something
called to me. Something intoxicating and lethal.
He leaned forward, anger etching his face. “You will learn your place.
Mark my words.”
I wanted to fight. I’d listened to their damn history lessons, it was time
they listened to mine. “I may not have records so perfectly kept as yours,
but I do know my family is innocent. Whatever happened back then was
between them—not us. Leave it in the past. My family created a business of
making clothes. We dressed the royal court but also donated to the poor. I’m
proud of where I’ve come from and for you to—”
“Jet!” Mr. Hawk pinched the bridge of his nose. “Shut her up.”
Jethro immediately slammed a hand over my mouth.
I froze. I knew I’d brought whatever punishment was about to happen
upon myself. I couldn’t blame anyone, but I wouldn’t let myself regret what
I’d said. I believed I was a good person. So were my twin, father, mother,
and ancestors.
“You just had to push,” Jethro hissed. “I’m going to draw blood for
this.”
My heart rabbited but I forced myself to remember one important fact.
They can’t hurt you too much.
There would be pain. There would be agony. But they meant to keep me
alive. I had debts to repay before my life was stolen.
Never taking his eyes off mine, Mr. Hawk, ordered, “Jethro. Teach this
woman that Hawks are a forgiving family but there are times when
strictness is required in lieu of allowing little tantrums like this to occur.”
His eyes switched from mine to his son’s. “Take her. Deal with her. I don’t
want to see her again until she’s lost the misplaced righteousness she seems
to think she’s owed.”
Jethro nodded, jostling our bodies. His fingers unglued from around my
mouth and he grabbed my wrist. Every part of me shrank from his
overbearing body and granite golden eyes, but I forced myself to stand tall.
I growled, “Whatever you do won’t matter. What happened before will
never happen again.” I would never let my body rule my mind no matter
what he did. “You may be able to hurt me but you should know how
pathetic it is for a man to hurt a woman. That isn’t power. It’s a weakness!”
He grunted under his breath. “Motherfucking Christ.” His temper
increased until the large room pulsed with it.
Another wave of vertigo grabbed my brain. But I managed the
impossible, fighting through the grey unsteady wave—staying on my feet.
I fought the imbalance thanks to letting myself unlock so many facets of
who I truly was. I stood proud and naked, wearing only dried saliva and
bruises.
Jethro jerked me closer. He swallowed his anger until nothing outward
showed—no annoyance or amazement—he was as opaque as a black
iceberg and just as sharp.
“If you will, Ms. Weaver.” Suddenly he let me go, waving toward the
double doors behind me. They opened wide as if staff waited on the other
side for his command.
When I didn’t move, he snapped, “Now!”
My arms wanted to wind around my body. I wanted to hide from his
intense gaze, but I fought every instinct and elegantly pirouetted on my
toes. I left the room as demurely and proudly as possible. Without a
backward glance.
The moment the doors slammed behind us, Jethro grabbed my elbow,
prowling forward as if the flames of hell craved his soul. I went from
walking to jogging to keep up with his pace.
My vision lost its clarity for a moment, fading in and out as another
wash of unbalance tried to steal me, but Jethro didn’t give me time to give
in. He didn’t give me time to care that he dragged me down a corridor so
wide it could’ve been a hall. He didn’t let me inspect the countless weapons
—swords, bayonets, crossbows, and knives—or catch the eye of surprised
staff.
I breathed hard when we finally crashed through one of the many
exterior doors and were welcomed from brooding red corridor to bright
early-autumn sun.
Jethro kept walking, not letting me catch my breath.
Dragging me down the four huge steps, I winced as the gravel bit into
the soles of my feet. But he didn’t care. He didn’t even notice.
Our feet kicked up pebbles as he headed toward the treeline several
metres from the house. I’d never seen this side of the property before. But
the grounds were just as expansive and impressive as the other perimeters
and just as dangerous.
This was my cage. Leaves and thorns and brambles.
And I’m naked.
The moment gravel was replaced by soft grass below my toes, Jethro
tossed me away. I would’ve fallen if I wasn’t malleable and given up
fighting his momentum. I stumbled forward, arms soaring outward as if I
could suddenly leave the world behind and fly. Fly away. Fly free.
The moment I came to a halt, I spun to face him.
Jethro was right behind me. He fisted my hair, twisting my neck.
I whimpered as he raised my head, higher and higher. My eyes coasted
over his crisp grey shirt, and locked onto a pair of ferocious eyes.
“Tell me. What did you hope to achieve in there?” He didn’t give me a
chance to reply, tugging my hair in a painful jerk. “Did you honestly think
before you opened your mouth? If you had stood there and been silent, it
would’ve all been over. You earned an afternoon on your own in a hot
steam bath. A maid to bring you whatever you wanted to eat.” He shook
me. “What part of a gift for good behaviour did you not understand?”
“I don’t want your charity.”
He groaned. “It’s not fucking charity if you’ve earned it.” Lowering his
head, his nose pressed against mine.
I froze.
“You earned it today. You pleased me by letting those men sample you.
You surprised me in a good way.” The softness of his voice disappeared
under a torrent of rage. “But then you fucked it all up by being you. And
now...” He trailed off, ideas glowing in his eyes.
Letting me go, I backed away from him, grabbing my hair and quickly
twisting it into a loose braid down my back. I hated the thickness, the
length. It seemed to invite Jethro to use it anyway he pleased. My scalp had
never been so bruised.
The diamond collar sent little rainbows of light bouncing from the
sunlight. I would’ve laughed if I wasn’t so tense. I was naked but wearing
rainbows—I never would’ve thought to combine magic with fashion.
Ideas for a new design line came thick and fast. I craved a pencil to
sketch before they disappeared.
Jethro placed both hands on his hips, watching me silently.
I didn’t move. I didn’t say a word. The fragile ceasefire between us
stretched uncomfortably thin. It would either snap and ricochet onto me
with terrible pain or fade away like a feather on a breeze.
“I see threats don’t work on you. But perhaps a negotiation might.”
Despite myself, curiosity and hope swelled in my heart. “A
negotiation?”
“A one shot offer. You win, you’re free. I win, you forget about your old
life and give in. You say I’ll never own you. If I win—you willingly give
me that right.” His lips pulled into a cold smile. “You sign not only the debt
agreement but another—one that makes me your master until your last
breath is taken. You do that, and I’ll give you this.”
“Give me what?” I asked breathlessly.
“A chance at freedom.”
My eyes popped wide.
What?
He cocked his head at the forest behind me. “You wanted to be free—so
go. Run. Go seek your freedom.”
I twisted on the spot, looking over my shoulder. The sun dappled
patches of leaf-strewn ground, looking like a fairy glen, but then it grew
darker and thicker and scarier.
The diamond collar rested heavy and ruinously ominous on my throat.
My spine ached from the short time I’d been made to wear it; the coldness
still hadn’t adapted to my skin. How could I run with such a deterrent?
How can you not?
It was the one chance I’d hoped for. The one chance I didn’t think I’d
get.
Squeezing my eyes, I let Jethro's ultimatum—his negotiation—seep into
my brain. If I ran, I might make it. If I ran, I might get what I wanted. But if
I lost...
Turning to face him again, the golden-light from the sun cast him with
ghostly silhouette, blurring his outline, creating more than just a man. He
looked as if he had one foot in this world and one in hell. A fallen angel
who still burned with fire—yet it wasn’t purity he burned with but hate.
Jethro raised an eyebrow. “What’s it going to be?”
“I don’t know what you’re offering.”
“Yes you do.”
I did. I do.
He took a small step toward me. “You want to break the contract? You
want to keep your brother and father safe? Fine. I’m giving you a one-time
deal. Run. If you make it to the boundary, you’re free. Your family will
never be hunted by the Hawks again. You make it, and this is all over.
Every last debt and ounce of history—disappears.” His voice licked through
the sunshine.
A small sparkle from my earlier orgasm rippled between my legs. “And
if I don’t?”
Jethro frowned. “What?”
“If I don’t run...what happens then?”
“You wouldn’t run? After I just offered you what you’ve wanted all
along?”
I crossed my wrists over the junction of my thighs, hiding my pussy. “I
didn’t say I wanted the chance to run naked through a thousand hectares. I
said I wanted this to be over.”
Jethro smirked. “It’s not over until it’s over.” His eyes fell to my collar,
glinting with darkness. “And we both know how it will be over.”
Moving closer, he said quietly, “There is no other option here, Ms.
Weaver. I’m not giving you the choice to run. I’m telling you to run. You
wanted it. You got it. One chance to save your family as well as your own
life. One chance. You do not want to fuck it up by testing my patience.”
My mind stumbled with everything that’d happened. There was no
denying chemistry flew between us—but Jethro didn’t respond. He was
only interested in the chase. The hunt. The sport.
He stood so close, every time he breathed, his chest almost touched my
nipples. He didn’t seem to care I was naked or offer clothing for this one
and only chance at freedom. He would make me run unprotected through a
forest full of brambles, predators, and trip-worthy roots.
His arm raised and I clamped every muscle from cringing as he cupped
my cheek. His heady scent of woods and leather settled over me. Tracing
the pad of his thumb over my cheekbone, he bowed his head. “Run, Ms.
Weaver. Run. But one thing you should know before you go.”
Do not play his games. Do not rise to the bait.
My lips stayed pinched together. I stiffened in his hold.
His mouth tickled the soft skin below my ear. “While you’re running,
I’ll be hunting. You not only have to get to the boundary but you have to do
it before I catch you.”
The tingle and horrible promise of hope evaporated. Cruel. Vicious.
Evil.
I’m to be hunted.
There wouldn’t be freedom. There would only be blood. Just like he
said in the dining room.
Energy left my limbs. Who was I kidding? I hadn’t eaten since I was
stolen. I’d barely had a decent sleep. I existed like a junkie on adrenaline
and fear. It was no combination for a long distance run through thickets and
bush.
Jethro pulled away, dropping his hands. He smiled. “Your head start
begins now, Ms. Weaver. I’d leave if I were you.”
Now?
I backpeddled, heart bursting with terror. “How—how long do I have?”
Jethro carefully raised his cuff, looking sedately at the diamond and
black watch on his wrist. “I’m a seasoned hunter. I have no doubt I’ll find
you. And when I do...what those men did to you will be nothing.” Cocking
his head, he said, “I think forty-five minutes is rather sporting, don’t you?”
My mind was no longer there. It was leaping and flying over leaves and
dodging ancient trunks.
Run. Go. Run.
“Make it and you’re no longer mine....”
Freedom taunted me, making me believe I had a chance. A slim, barely
non-existent chance—but still a chance. The muscles in my legs reacted,
already poised to take off. I had to trust my body. It knew how to flee.
I could make it. If I did, I would no longer be his pet to torture. But if I
didn’t....
Don’t ask. Don’t ask.
“And if I don’t?”
Jethro lowered his head, glaring at me beneath his brow. His eyes were
tight and dark, glinting with excitement at the upcoming hunt. “Don’t and
the debt I’ll make you repay will make you wish you had made it to the
boundary.” He stepped from the sun’s glare, his teeth sparkling like
diamonds. “Now...run.”
I ran.
*
End of Book 1. Continue in Book 2 [First Debt]!



